Alaska, session 34, HB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2026 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Centralized Administrative Services 107,238,000 12,488,200 94,749,800 11 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 13 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans. 14 Office of Administrative 3,574,100 15 Hearings 16 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,131,800 17 Owned 18 Office of the Commissioner 1,198,500 19 Administrative Services 3,311,700 20 Finance 25,534,100 21 The amount allocated for Finance includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 22 30, 2025, of program receipts from credit card rebates. 23 Personnel 13,427,300 24 The amount allocated for the Division of Personnel for the Americans with Disabilities Act 25 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts 26 collected for cost allocation of the Americans with Disabilities Act. 27 Retirement and Benefits 23,344,100 28 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 29 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 30 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 31 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 01 Health Plans Administration 35,678,900 02 Labor Agreements 37,500 03 Miscellaneous Items 04 Shared Services of Alaska 17,709,800 9,418,400 8,291,400 05 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 06 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts and general fund program receipts 07 collected in the Department of Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans, 08 which includes receipts collected by Shared Services of Alaska in connection with its debt 09 collection activities. 10 Office of Procurement and 4,922,900 11 Property Management 12 Accounting 10,367,900 13 Print Services 2,419,000 14 State Facilities Maintenance and 506,200 506,200 15 Operations 16 Facilities Rent State Owned 506,200 17 Public Communications Services 879,500 779,500 100,000 18 Satellite Infrastructure 879,500 19 Office of Information Technology 65,567,700 65,567,700 20 Helpdesk & Enterprise 5,106,400 21 Support 22 Information Technology 5,563,700 23 Strategic Support 24 Licensing, Infrastructure & 44,652,500 25 Servers 26 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Information Technology shall present a plan 27 to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by 28 December 20, 2025 to contain the growth of information technology costs relating to cloud 29 services and software licensing in the Executive Branch. 30 Chief Information Officer 10,245,100 31 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Information Technology shall present a 01 prioritized plan to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance 02 Division by December 20, 2025 for the uses, costs, and expected benefits of projects using 03 artificial intelligence. 04 Risk Management 35,195,600 35,195,600 05 Risk Management 35,195,600 06 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 07 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 08 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plan. 09 Legal and Advocacy Services 85,701,200 82,170,800 3,530,400 10 Office of Public Advocacy 40,724,200 11 Public Defender Agency 44,977,000 12 Alaska Public Offices Commission 1,272,500 1,272,500 13 Alaska Public Offices 1,272,500 14 Commission 15 Motor Vehicles 21,710,800 21,114,300 596,500 16 Motor Vehicles 21,710,800 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Executive Administration 11,223,500 1,272,300 9,951,200 21 Commissioner's Office 2,094,500 22 Administrative Services 6,032,700 23 Alaska Broadband Office 3,096,300 24 Banking and Securities 5,437,800 5,387,800 50,000 25 Banking and Securities 5,437,800 26 Community and Regional Affairs 19,733,500 8,915,800 10,817,700 27 Community and Regional 13,496,800 28 Affairs 29 It is the intent of the legislature that the Bristol Bay Science and Research Institute continue to 30 share data with the Alaska Department of Fish and Game. 31 Serve Alaska 6,236,700 01 Revenue Sharing 22,728,200 22,728,200 02 Payment in Lieu of Taxes 10,428,200 03 (PILT) 04 National Forest Receipts 9,200,000 05 Fisheries Taxes 3,100,000 06 Corporations, Business and 22,187,600 21,048,300 1,139,300 07 Professional Licensing 08 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 09 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts collected under AS 08.01.065(a), (c), and (f) - (i). 10 Corporations, Business and 22,187,600 11 Professional Licensing 12 Investments 6,222,600 6,222,600 13 Investments 6,222,600 14 Insurance Operations 9,036,300 8,462,600 573,700 15 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes up to $1,000,000 of the unexpended 16 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and 17 Economic Development, Division of Insurance, program receipts from license fees and 18 service fees. 19 Insurance Operations 9,036,300 20 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 9,300,700 9,075,700 225,000 21 Commission 22 Alaska Oil and Gas 9,300,700 23 Conservation Commission 24 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 25 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission receipts 26 account for regulatory cost charges collected under AS 31.05.093. 27 Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office 4,924,500 4,924,500 28 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 29 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Commerce, Community and Economic 30 Development, Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office, program receipts from the licensing and 31 application fees related to the regulation of alcohol and marijuana. 01 Alcohol and Marijuana 4,924,500 02 Control Office 03 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation 5,482,000 2,238,800 3,243,200 04 Alaska Gasline Development 5,482,000 05 Corporation 06 Alaska Energy Authority 22,456,300 6,996,800 15,459,500 07 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 08 Owned Facilities 09 Alaska Energy Authority 14,812,200 10 Rural Energy Assistance 11 Alaska Energy Authority 233,900 12 Power Cost Equalization 13 Statewide Project 6,211,200 14 Development, Alternative 15 Energy and Efficiency 16 Alaska Industrial Development and 12,419,600 12,419,600 17 Export Authority 18 Alaska Industrial 11,921,100 19 Development and Export 20 Authority 21 Alaska Industrial 498,500 22 Development Corporation 23 Facilities Maintenance 24 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute 26,488,100 26,488,100 25 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 26 balance on June 30, 2025, of the statutory designated program receipts from the seafood 27 marketing assessment (AS 16.51.120) and other statutory designated program receipts of the 28 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute. 29 Alaska Seafood Marketing 26,488,100 30 Institute 31 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 10,925,600 10,762,500 163,100 01 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 02 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 03 Development, Regulatory Commission of Alaska receipts account for regulatory cost charges 04 under AS 42.05.254, AS 42.06.286, and AS 42.08.380. 05 Regulatory Commission of 10,925,600 06 Alaska 07 Facility Maintenance and Operations 3,121,300 599,200 2,522,100 08 Facilities Rent State Owned 1,614,500 09 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,506,800 10 Owned 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Corrections prepare a report to the 15 legislature that analyzes the possibility of closing an institution and submit it to the Co-chairs 16 of the Finance committees and the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025. The 17 report should examine which institutions would produce the most cost savings if they were 18 closed, estimate the long-term cost savings associated with closing those institutions, and 19 what transition costs would be needed, including capital costs. 20 Facility Operations and Maintenance 28,536,000 13,726,600 14,809,400 21 24 Hour Institutional 11,882,000 22 Utilities 23 Non-Institutional Utilities 42,500 24 24 Hour Institutional 11,042,200 25 Maintenance 26 Non-Institutional 5,300 27 Maintenance & Operations 28 Non-State Owned Leases 2,000,000 29 Facility-Capital 1,774,100 30 Improvement Unit 31 DOC State Facilities Rent 1,789,900 01 Administration and Support 13,482,600 12,685,000 797,600 02 Office of the Commissioner 2,737,600 03 Administrative Services 5,852,700 04 Information Technology MIS 3,806,100 05 Research and Records 1,086,200 06 Population Management 319,892,300 310,893,200 8,999,100 07 Peer Support and Wellness 518,100 08 Program 09 Recruitment and Retention 746,400 10 Correctional Academy 1,999,900 11 Institution Director's 2,943,400 12 Office 13 Classification and Furlough 1,684,000 14 Out-of-State Contractual 300,000 15 Inmate Transportation 3,233,500 16 Point of Arrest 628,700 17 Anchorage Correctional 37,919,900 18 Complex 19 The amount allocated for the Anchorage Correctional Complex includes the unexpended and 20 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of federal receipts received by the Department of 21 Corrections through manday billings. 22 It is the intent of the legislature the State of Alaska, through the Department of Corrections 23 (DOC), no longer covers the full cost of unsentenced federal inmates housed in State 24 facilities. The legislature urges the Department to coordinate with the Department of Law to 25 either receive adequate daily funding for federal inmates housed in State facilities or to 26 determine a method for them to be housed at a federal or private facility until court hearings. 27 DOC and Department of Law shall then submit a joint response to the Co-chairs of the 28 Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025, outlining 29 the determined terms, number of federal inmates housed in State facilities by day in 2025 and 30 the final cost associated to the State, if any. 31 Anvil Mountain Correctional 9,730,600 01 Center 02 Combined Hiland Mountain 20,701,300 03 Correctional Center 04 Fairbanks Correctional 16,932,900 05 Center 06 Goose Creek Correctional 55,303,400 07 Center 08 Ketchikan Correctional 6,529,100 09 Center 10 Lemon Creek Correctional 15,546,500 11 Center 12 Matanuska-Susitna 8,995,400 13 Correctional Center 14 Palmer Correctional Center 21,437,000 15 Spring Creek Correctional 23,523,600 16 Center 17 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Corrections permanently close one 18 housing unit at Spring Creek Correctional Facility. Closing one unit will allow the 19 Department to direct personnel resources to other areas of the facility, reduce overtime, and 20 find efficiencies. The Department shall provide a report to the Co-chairs of the Finance 21 committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025, detailing the 22 efforts taken towards closing a housing unit, and resulting cost savings and efficiencies. 23 Wildwood Correctional 20,432,600 24 Center 25 Yukon-Kuskokwim 12,988,500 26 Correctional Center 27 Point MacKenzie 6,136,200 28 Correctional Farm 29 Probation and Parole 1,638,500 30 Director's Office 31 Pre-Trial Services 17,943,500 01 Statewide Probation and 21,152,400 02 Parole 03 Regional and Community 8,909,400 04 Jails 05 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Corrections continue the reform of the 06 Regional and Community Jails program. Since the program's inception, public safety has 07 changed in the state and jails are not utilized to the same extent. Therefore, the Department 08 should renegotiate FY27 contracts by reducing the bed count by two-thirds if the individual 09 community's unused bed rate was over sixty percent, when FY24 and FY25 are averaged, and 10 any other corresponding costs. This realignment prevents closures and allows communities to 11 maintain a jail with a more appropriate bed count and cost to the State. The Department shall 12 issue a status report to the to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative 13 Finance Division by December 20, 2025. 14 Parole Board 2,017,500 15 Community Residential Centers 18,030,100 18,030,100 16 Community Residential 18,030,100 17 Centers 18 Electronic Monitoring 3,067,100 3,067,100 19 Electronic Monitoring 3,067,100 20 The amount allocated for Electronic Monitoring includes the unexpended and unobligated 21 balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from electronic monitoring fees. 22 Health and Rehabilitation Services 86,060,300 74,426,100 11,634,200 23 Health and Rehabilitation 1,811,800 24 Director's Office 25 Physical Health Care 71,342,800 26 Behavioral Health Care 4,638,300 27 Substance Abuse Treatment 4,236,300 28 Program 29 Sex Offender Management 3,131,100 30 Program 31 Domestic Violence Program 175,000 01 Reentry Unit 725,000 02 Offender Habilitation 1,646,900 1,490,600 156,300 03 Education Programs 1,040,900 04 Vocational Education 606,000 05 Programs 06 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,766,700 766,700 1,000,000 07 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,766,700 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 K-12 Aid to School Districts 20,791,000 20,791,000 12 Foundation Program 20,791,000 13 K-12 Support 13,717,500 13,717,500 14 Residential Schools Program 8,535,800 15 Youth in Detention 1,100,000 16 Special Schools 4,081,700 17 Education Support and Admin Services 316,159,500 68,275,800 247,883,700 18 Executive Administration 1,961,700 19 Administrative Services 4,320,500 20 Information Services 2,424,900 21 Broadband Assistance Grants 21,011,100 22 School Finance & Facilities 2,989,500 23 It is the intent of the legislature that a school district report to the Department twice annually, 24 once by the end of the count period set out in AS 14.17.500, and on February 1, 2026, the 25 balance of each of the following funds: 1) school operating fund, 2) special revenue funds, 3) 26 capital project funds, 4) other governmental funds. Additionally, each fund shall be reported 27 based on the following classifications: 1) nonspendable fund balance, 2) restricted fund 28 balance, 3) committed fund balance, 4) assigned fund balance, 5) unassigned balance. The 29 Department shall provide these reports and associated data in electronic format to the Co- 30 chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 31 2025 and by February 15, 2026. 01 Child Nutrition 77,420,800 02 Student and School 176,123,700 03 Achievement 04 Career and Technical 7,323,700 05 Education 06 Teacher Certification 1,456,900 07 The amount allocated for Teacher Certification includes the unexpended and unobligated 08 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Education and Early Development receipts 09 from teacher certification fees under AS 14.20.020(c). 10 Early Learning Coordination 14,926,800 11 Pre-Kindergarten Grants 6,199,900 12 Alaska State Council on the Arts 4,202,000 913,500 3,288,500 13 Alaska State Council on the 4,202,000 14 Arts 15 Commissions and Boards 293,300 293,300 16 Professional Teaching 293,300 17 Practices Commission 18 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 16,190,600 6,336,900 9,853,700 19 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 20 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected by Mt. Edgecumbe High School, 21 not to exceed the amount authorized in AS 14.17.505(a). 22 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 14,394,900 23 Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic 601,200 24 Center 25 The amount allocated for Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic Center includes the unexpended and 26 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from aquatic center fees. 27 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 1,194,500 28 Facility Operations and 29 Maintenance State Owned 30 Facility Maintenance and Operations 718,200 718,200 31 Facilities Rent State Owned 718,200 01 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department not enter into new leases, expand office 02 space, or otherwise incur new facilities costs. 03 Alaska State Libraries, Archives and 12,490,400 10,291,500 2,198,900 04 Museums 05 Library Operations 6,286,200 06 Archives 1,725,900 07 Museum Operations 2,634,900 08 The amount allocated for Museum Operations includes the unexpended and unobligated 09 balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from museum gate receipts. 10 Online with Libraries (OWL) 504,100 11 Andrew P. Kashevaroff 1,339,300 12 Facility Operations and 13 Maintenance State Owned 14 Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 16,937,900 5,929,400 11,008,500 15 Education 16 Program Administration & 11,797,800 17 Operations 18 WWAMI Medical Education 5,140,100 19 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 10,858,400 10,858,400 20 Loan Servicing 10,858,400 21 Student Financial Aid Programs 25,521,000 25,521,000 22 Alaska Performance 17,014,000 23 Scholarship Awards 24 Alaska Education Grants 8,507,000 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Administration 14,177,300 4,708,900 9,468,400 29 Office of the Commissioner 1,369,200 30 Administrative Services 7,571,800 31 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 02 Department of Environmental Conservation's federal approved indirect cost allocation plan 03 for expenditures incurred by the Department of Environmental Conservation. 04 State Support Services 2,236,300 05 Facilities Rent Non-State 3,000,000 06 Owned 07 State Facilities Maintenance and 883,800 883,800 08 Operations 09 Facilities Operations and 883,800 10 Maintenance State Owned 11 Environmental Health 30,807,800 14,301,300 16,506,500 12 Environmental Health 30,807,800 13 Air Quality 16,705,200 4,507,000 12,198,200 14 Air Quality 16,705,200 15 The amount allocated for Air Quality includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 16 June 30, 2025, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of Air Quality 17 general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 46.14.240 and AS 46.14.250. 18 Spill Prevention and Response 25,153,700 15,783,600 9,370,100 19 Spill Prevention and 25,123,700 20 Response 21 SPAR Facilities Rent State 30,000 22 Owned 23 Water 31,627,300 8,677,300 22,950,000 24 Water Quality, 31,627,300 25 Infrastructure Support & 26 Financing 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Family and Community Services, 31 up to $7,500,000 may be transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Family 01 and Community Services. 02 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department shall submit a report of transfers between 03 appropriations that occurred during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 to the Co-chairs of 04 the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by September 30, 2026. 05 Alaska Pioneer Homes 113,198,200 65,792,900 47,405,300 06 Alaska Pioneer Homes 33,964,300 07 Payment Assistance 08 Alaska Pioneer Homes 1,954,900 09 Management 10 Pioneer Homes 64,323,300 11 The amount allocated for Pioneer Homes includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 12 on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Family and Community Services, Pioneer Homes care 13 and support receipts under AS 47.55.030. 14 Facility Rent, Operations, 12,955,700 15 and Maintenance 16 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 46,702,800 6,813,300 39,889,500 17 Alaska Psychiatric 44,105,900 18 Institute 19 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,596,900 20 and Maintenance 21 Children's Services 210,061,900 124,971,400 85,090,500 22 Tribal Child Welfare 5,000,000 23 Compact 24 Children's Services 11,147,100 25 Management 26 Children's Services 1,470,700 27 Training 28 Front Line Social Workers 77,559,400 29 Family Preservation 22,132,100 30 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department, in collaboration with the Department of 31 Public Safety, consider how to maintain funding for Child Advocacy Center services when 01 preparing its FY27 budget submission to the legislature. 02 Foster Care Base Rate 27,025,900 03 Foster Care Augmented Rate 4,323,900 04 Foster Care Special Need 10,324,700 05 Subsidized Adoptions & 45,606,500 06 Guardianship 07 Facility Rent, Operations, 5,471,600 08 and Maintenance 09 Juvenile Justice 69,245,500 66,420,300 2,825,200 10 McLaughlin Youth Center 19,382,100 11 Mat-Su Youth Facility 3,045,000 12 Kenai Peninsula Youth 2,465,400 13 Facility 14 Fairbanks Youth Facility 4,936,500 15 Bethel Youth Facility 6,327,200 16 Johnson Youth Center 5,338,700 17 Probation Services 20,103,400 18 Delinquency Prevention 1,265,000 19 Youth Courts 469,400 20 Juvenile Justice Health 1,488,600 21 Care 22 Facility Rent, Operations, 4,424,200 23 and Maintenance 24 Departmental Support Services 34,297,500 13,547,100 20,750,400 25 Coordinated Health and 10,531,200 26 Complex Care 27 Information Technology 7,374,400 28 Services 29 Public Affairs 1,248,700 30 Commissioner's Office 2,464,600 31 Administrative Services 9,816,400 01 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,862,200 02 and Maintenance 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 The amount appropriated for the Department of Fish and Game includes the unexpended and 07 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts collected under the Department of Fish and 08 Game's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Fish and 09 Game. 10 Commercial Fisheries 93,855,600 64,255,600 29,600,000 11 The amount appropriated for Commercial Fisheries includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Fish and Game receipts from commercial 13 fisheries test fishing operations receipts under AS 16.05.050(a)(14), and from commercial 14 crew member licenses. 15 Southeast Region Fisheries 21,261,000 16 Management 17 Central Region Fisheries 13,492,200 18 Management 19 AYK Region Fisheries 12,627,900 20 Management 21 Westward Region Fisheries 16,988,500 22 Management 23 Statewide Fisheries 24,593,800 24 Management 25 Commercial Fisheries Entry 3,890,100 26 Commission 27 The amount allocated for Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission includes the unexpended 28 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Fish and Game, Commercial 29 Fisheries Entry Commission program receipts from licenses, permits, and other fees. 30 Comm Fish Facility 900,100 31 Operations and Maintenance 01 State Owned 02 Comm Fish Facility 102,000 03 Operations and Maintenance 04 Non-State Owned 05 Sport Fisheries 47,434,800 1,938,600 45,496,200 06 Sport Fisheries 47,196,100 07 Sport Fish Facility 218,700 08 Operations and Maintenance 09 State Owned 10 Sport Fish Facility 20,000 11 Operations and Maintenance 12 Non-State Owned 13 Anchorage and Fairbanks Hatcheries 7,411,100 5,601,000 1,810,100 14 Anchorage and Fairbanks 4,758,800 15 Hatcheries 16 Hatcheries Facility 2,652,300 17 Operations and Maintenance 18 State Owned 19 Southeast Hatcheries 1,351,600 1,047,300 304,300 20 Southeast Hatcheries 1,351,600 21 Wildlife Conservation 73,599,800 3,261,300 70,338,500 22 Wildlife Conservation 71,363,400 23 Hunter Education Public 1,816,400 24 Shooting Ranges 25 Wildlife Cons. Facility 400,000 26 Operations and Maintenance 27 State Owned 28 Wildlife Cons. Facility 20,000 29 Operations and Maintenance 30 Non-State Owned 31 Statewide Support Services 35,035,300 4,960,300 30,075,000 01 Commissioner's Office 1,595,100 02 Administrative Services 16,543,200 03 Boards of Fisheries and 1,447,100 04 Game 05 Advisory Committees 563,900 06 EVOS Trustee Council 2,405,300 07 Statewide Support Services 7,000,000 08 Facilities Rent State Owned 09 Statewide Support Services 1,000,000 10 Facilities Rent Non-State 11 Owned 12 Statewide Support Services 365,100 13 Facility Operations and 14 Maintenance State Owned 15 Statewide Support Services 102,000 16 Facility Operations and 17 Maintenance Non-State Owned 18 State Facilities 4,013,600 19 Maintenance and Operations 20 Habitat 6,630,400 4,246,900 2,383,500 21 Habitat 6,616,400 22 Habitat Facility Operations 14,000 23 and Maintenance Non-State 24 Owned 25 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 7,827,600 3,427,800 4,399,800 26 State Subsistence Research 7,813,600 27 Subsistence Facility 14,000 28 Operations and Maintenance 29 Non-State Owned 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 Federal Infrastructure Office 250,000 250,000 03 Federal Infrastructure 250,000 04 Office 05 Executive Operations 16,680,900 16,466,600 214,300 06 Executive Office 14,084,500 07 Governor's House 804,800 08 Contingency Fund 250,000 09 Lieutenant Governor 1,496,800 10 Facilities Operations and 44,800 11 Maintenance State Owned 12 Facilities Rent 1,436,800 1,436,800 13 Facilities Rent State Owned 946,200 14 Facilities Rent Non-State 490,600 15 Owned 16 Office of Management and Budget 3,483,900 3,483,900 17 Office of Management and 3,483,900 18 Budget 19 It is the intent of the legislature that, in preparing the fiscal year 2027 budget, the Office of 20 Management and Budget use zero-based budgeting principles to prepare the budget of one 21 agency. The director of the Office of Management and Budget shall submit a report not later 22 than December 20, 2025, to the Co-chairs of the Finance committee of each house of the 23 legislature and to the Legislative Finance Division that provides a detailed explanation of each 24 agency that was selected for zero-based budgeting and an analysis and justification for each 25 expense of the agency. 26 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Management and Budget submit a report by 27 December 20, 2025, to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative 28 Finance Division that shows overtime, bonus, standby, and any other specialty pay that are 29 included in the Fiscal Year 2026 Management Plan for each agency. It is the further intent of 30 the legislature that the Office of Management and Budget submit a report by September 30, 31 2026, to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division that 01 provides actual amounts of overtime, bonus, standby, and any other specialty pay that were 02 paid out in Fiscal Year 2026 for each agency. 03 Elections 6,319,000 6,100,700 218,300 04 Elections 6,319,000 05 Commissions/Special Offices 2,989,700 2,837,800 151,900 06 Human Rights Commission 2,989,700 07 The amount allocated for Human Rights Commission includes the unexpended and 08 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Office of the Governor, Human Rights 09 Commission federal receipts. 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Health, up to $10,000,000 may be 14 transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Health, except that no transfer 15 may be made from the Medicaid Services appropriation. 16 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department shall submit a report of transfers between 17 appropriations that occurred during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to the Co-chairs of 18 the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by September 30, 2026. 19 Behavioral Health 41,918,600 6,711,000 35,207,600 20 Behavioral Health Treatment 16,384,600 21 and Recovery Grants 22 Alcohol Safety Action 4,347,300 23 Program (ASAP) 24 Behavioral Health 18,030,700 25 Administration 26 Behavioral Health 1,942,900 27 Prevention and Early 28 Intervention Grants 29 Alaska Mental Health Board 118,700 30 and Advisory Board on 31 Alcohol and Drug Abuse 01 Suicide Prevention Council 30,000 02 Residential Child Care 1,064,400 03 Health Care Services 26,201,800 12,037,200 14,164,600 04 Health Facilities Licensing 4,175,500 05 and Certification 06 Residential Licensing 5,728,200 07 Medical Assistance 16,131,900 08 Administration 09 Health Care Services 166,200 10 Facility Operations and 11 Maintenance 12 Public Assistance 309,429,200 118,826,400 190,602,800 13 Alaska Temporary Assistance 21,866,900 14 Program 15 Adult Public Assistance 63,786,900 16 Child Care Benefits 61,343,400 17 General Relief Assistance 605,400 18 Tribal Assistance Programs 14,234,600 19 Permanent Fund Dividend 17,791,500 20 Hold Harmless 21 Energy Assistance Program 14,665,000 22 Public Assistance 12,269,900 23 Administration 24 Public Assistance Field 59,378,700 25 Services 26 Fraud Investigation 2,592,700 27 Quality Control 2,973,300 28 Work Services 11,879,300 29 Women, Infants and Children 23,448,400 30 Public Assistance Facility 2,593,200 31 Operations and Maintenance 01 Public Health 145,994,600 67,792,000 78,202,600 02 Nursing 32,275,700 03 Women, Children and Family 15,364,800 04 Health 05 Public Health 3,732,400 06 Administrative Services 07 Emergency Programs 17,831,400 08 Chronic Disease Prevention 28,239,800 09 and Health Promotion 10 Epidemiology 19,848,400 11 Bureau of Vital Statistics 5,877,700 12 Emergency Medical Services 3,183,700 13 Grants 14 State Medical Examiner 4,371,600 15 Public Health Laboratories 9,702,800 16 Public Health Facility 5,566,300 17 Operations and Maintenance 18 Senior and Disabilities Services 63,870,700 36,506,100 27,364,600 19 Senior and Disabilities 22,889,100 20 Community Based Grants 21 Early Intervention/Infant 1,859,100 22 Learning Programs 23 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department direct grantees of the Infant Learning 24 Program to expand service provision from children with a 50 percent or more delay in one 25 developmental area to children with a 25 percent or more delay in one developmental area, or 26 with a 20 percent delay or more in two developmental areas. 27 Senior and Disabilities 26,407,900 28 Services Administration 29 General Relief/Temporary 10,154,700 30 Assisted Living 31 Commission on Aging 261,300 01 Governor's Council on 1,462,800 02 Disabilities and Special 03 Education 04 Senior and Disabilities 835,800 05 Services Facility 06 Operations and Maintenance 07 Senior Benefits Payment Program 23,542,300 23,542,300 08 Senior Benefits Payment 23,542,300 09 Program 10 Departmental Support Services 45,262,100 12,092,600 33,169,500 11 Public Affairs 2,214,800 12 Quality Assurance and Audit 1,297,800 13 Commissioner's Office 4,865,000 14 Administrative Support 11,351,800 15 Services 16 Information Technology 18,688,500 17 Services 18 Rate Review 3,225,800 19 Department Support Services 3,618,400 20 Facility Operations and 21 Maintenance 22 Human Services Community Matching 1,387,000 1,387,000 23 Grant 24 Human Services Community 1,387,000 25 Matching Grant 26 Community Initiative Matching Grants 861,700 861,700 27 Community Initiative 861,700 28 Matching Grants (non- 29 statutory grants) 30 Medicaid Services 3,005,954,700 678,652,600 2,327,302,100 31 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department submit the Medicaid Services Projection 01 Model and Summary Overview of UGF Medicaid Increments with year-to-date information 02 for fiscal year 2026 to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance 03 Division by December 15, 2025, and subsequently update the report before resubmitting it by 04 February 17, 2026. 05 Medicaid Services 2,978,950,200 06 It is the intent of the legislature that the Temporary Increment (FY26-FY27) for clinical 07 behavioral health services provide bridge funding through augmented clinic and rehabilitation 08 rates while the Department of Health completes a rebasing methodology study and 09 implements rates to cover the true cost of delivering all behavioral health services under the 10 Medicaid State Plan Amendment. 11 No money appropriated in this appropriation may be expended for an abortion that is not a 12 mandatory service required under AS 47.07.030(a). The money appropriated for the 13 Department of Health may be expended only for mandatory services required under Title XIX 14 of the Social Security Act, unless a U.S. Supreme Court decision provides new precedent, and 15 for optional services offered by the state under the state plan for medical assistance that has 16 been approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 17 Adult Preventative Dental 27,004,500 18 Medicaid Svcs 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Commissioner and Administrative 41,992,400 14,956,600 27,035,800 23 Services 24 Technology Services 6,891,700 25 Commissioner's Office 1,469,200 26 Workforce Investment Board 20,837,900 27 Alaska Labor Relations 626,900 28 Agency 29 Office of Citizenship 463,100 30 Assistance 31 Management Services 5,279,200 01 The amount allocated for Management Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 02 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 03 Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 04 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 05 Leasing 2,002,500 06 Labor Market Information 4,421,900 07 Workers' Compensation 12,758,200 12,758,200 08 Workers' Compensation 7,071,900 09 Workers' Compensation 503,300 10 Appeals Commission 11 Workers' Compensation 805,100 12 Benefits Guaranty Fund 13 Second Injury Fund 2,902,500 14 Fishermen's Fund 1,475,400 15 Labor Standards and Safety 13,245,300 8,696,700 4,548,600 16 Wage and Hour 3,048,100 17 Administration 18 Mechanical Inspection 3,991,700 19 Occupational Safety and 5,912,800 20 Health 21 Alaska Safety Advisory 292,700 22 Program 23 The amount allocated for the Alaska Safety Advisory Program includes the unexpended and 24 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 25 Development, Alaska Safety Advisory Program receipts under AS 18.60.030(16). 26 Employment and Training Services 59,289,100 5,815,700 53,473,400 27 Employment and Training 2,872,900 28 Services Administration 29 The amount allocated for Employment and Training Services Administration includes the 30 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years 31 collected under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost 01 plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 02 Workforce Services 29,299,500 03 Unemployment Insurance 27,116,700 04 Vocational Rehabilitation 30,452,900 5,081,300 25,371,600 05 Vocational Rehabilitation 1,326,700 06 Administration 07 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 08 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 09 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 10 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 11 Client Services 19,496,200 12 Disability Determination 6,662,200 13 Special Projects 2,967,800 14 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 15,924,900 9,778,500 6,146,400 15 Alaska Vocational Technical 12,976,800 16 Center 17 The amount allocated for the Alaska Vocational Technical Center includes the unexpended 18 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational 19 Technical Center receipts under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, 20 AS 43.65.018, AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 and receipts collected under AS 37.05.146. 21 State Facilities 2,948,100 22 Maintenance and Operations 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Criminal Division 57,835,400 51,767,100 6,068,300 27 It is the intent of the legislature the State of Alaska no longer cover the full cost of housing 28 unsentenced federal inmates in State facilities. Therefore, the legislature urges the Department 29 of Law to work with the Department of Corrections and federal agencies to either receive 30 adequate daily funding for federal inmates housed in State facilities or to determine a method 31 for them to be housed at a federal or private facility until court hearings. Law and DOC shall 01 submit a joint response to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative 02 Finance Division by December 20, 2025, outlining the determined terms, number of federal 03 inmates housed in State facilities by month in 2025 and the final cost associated to the State, 04 if any. 05 First Judicial District 3,748,900 06 Second Judicial District 3,838,200 07 Third Judicial District: 11,844,600 08 Anchorage 09 Third Judicial District: 9,513,400 10 Outside Anchorage 11 Fourth Judicial District 9,731,200 12 Criminal Justice Litigation 5,731,300 13 Criminal Appeals/Special 13,427,800 14 Litigation 15 Civil Division 64,283,900 32,001,900 32,282,000 16 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 18 federally approved cost allocation plan. 19 Deputy Attorney General's 1,287,500 20 Office 21 Civil Defense Litigation 4,687,700 22 Government Services 4,764,400 23 Health, Safety & Welfare 13,608,300 24 Labor, Business & 8,423,000 25 Corporations 26 Legal Support Services 14,315,600 27 Resource Development & 11,284,400 28 Infrastructure 29 Special Litigation & 5,913,000 30 Appeals 31 The amount allocated for Special Litigation and Appeals includes the unexpended and 01 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of designated program receipts of the Department of 02 Law, Special Litigation and Appeals, that are required by the terms of a settlement or 03 judgment to be spent by the state for consumer education or consumer protection. 04 Administration and Support 10,588,500 3,390,800 7,197,700 05 Office of the Attorney 986,100 06 General 07 Administrative Services 3,947,600 08 Facility Operations and 42,900 09 Maintenance State Owned 10 Facilities Rent State Owned 1,053,400 11 Facility Operations and 335,500 12 Maintenance Non-State Owned 13 Facilities Rent Non-State 4,223,000 14 Owned 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Military and Veterans' Affairs 57,154,400 18,090,200 39,064,200 19 Office of the Commissioner 7,342,200 20 Homeland Security and 10,157,500 21 Emergency Management 22 Army Guard Facilities 15,529,900 23 Maintenance 24 Alaska Wing Civil Air 250,000 25 Patrol 26 Air Guard Facilities 8,073,100 27 Maintenance 28 Alaska Military Youth 12,405,500 29 Academy 30 Veterans' Services 2,783,100 31 State Active Duty 525,000 01 Facilities Rent - Non State 88,100 02 Owned 03 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 10,535,900 10,535,900 04 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 05 balance on June 30, 2025, of the federal and corporate receipts of the Department of Military 06 and Veterans' Affairs, Alaska Aerospace Corporation. 07 Alaska Aerospace 3,911,600 08 Corporation 09 Alaska Aerospace 6,624,300 10 Corporation Facilities 11 Maintenance 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 Administration & Support Services 36,900,700 20,063,700 16,837,000 16 Commissioner's Office 2,227,100 17 Office of Project 7,750,400 18 Management & Permitting 19 Administrative Services 4,726,700 20 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 21 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 22 Department of Natural Resource's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the 23 Department of Natural Resources. 24 Information Resource 4,065,300 25 Management 26 Interdepartmental 1,516,900 27 Chargebacks 28 Recorder's Office/Uniform 4,368,800 29 Commercial Code 30 EVOS Trustee Council 173,800 31 Projects 01 Public Information Center 894,800 02 State Facilities 11,176,900 03 Maintenance and Operations 04 Oil & Gas 24,101,700 11,120,200 12,981,500 05 Oil & Gas 24,101,700 06 The amount allocated for Oil & Gas includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 07 June 30, 2025, not to exceed $7,000,000, of the revenue from the Right-of-Way leases. 08 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 96,445,200 72,887,400 23,557,800 09 Resources 10 Mining, Land & Water 36,161,000 11 The amount allocated for Mining, Land and Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2025, not to exceed $5,000,000, of the receipts collected under AS 13 38.05.035(a)(5). 14 Forest Management & 11,521,900 15 Development 16 The amount allocated for Forest Management and Development includes the unexpended and 17 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the timber receipts account (AS 38.05.110). 18 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department prepare a report of infrastructure projects 19 related to expanding or improving access to timber. The report should include a list of all 20 projects detailing what activities were performed and the costs incurred for each project in the 21 past year. The report should also provide the available balance of Timber Sales Receipts with 22 total annual expenditures and revenues. The report should be submitted to the Co-chairs of the 23 Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025. 24 Geological & Geophysical 16,710,600 25 Surveys 26 The amount allocated for Geological & Geophysical Surveys includes the unexpended and 27 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 41.08.045. 28 Fire Suppression 32,051,700 29 Preparedness 30 Agriculture 9,678,100 5,283,000 4,395,100 31 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2025, of registration and endorsement fees, fines, and penalties collected 02 under AS 03.05.076. 03 Agricultural Development 5,785,100 04 North Latitude Plant 3,893,000 05 Material Center 06 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 23,911,500 15,387,700 8,523,800 07 Parks Management & Access 20,666,800 08 The amount allocated for Parks Management and Access includes the unexpended and 09 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 41.21.026. 10 Office of History and 3,244,700 11 Archaeology 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 Fire and Life Safety 7,769,800 6,792,700 977,100 16 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 18.70.080(b), AS 18.70.350(4), 18 and AS 18.70.360. 19 Fire and Life Safety 7,328,400 20 Alaska Fire Standards 396,400 21 Council 22 FLS Facility Maintenance 45,000 23 and Operations 24 Alaska State Troopers 213,827,300 194,097,400 19,729,900 25 Special Projects 7,431,700 26 Alaska Bureau of Highway 2,809,100 27 Patrol 28 Alaska Bureau of Judicial 5,356,400 29 Services 30 Prisoner Transportation 2,035,000 31 Search and Rescue 317,000 01 Rural Trooper Housing 5,903,200 02 Dispatch Services 7,008,400 03 Statewide Drug and Alcohol 11,131,100 04 Enforcement Unit 05 Alaska State Trooper 95,422,200 06 Detachments 07 Training Academy Recruit 1,967,800 08 Salaries 09 Alaska Bureau of 19,008,600 10 Investigation 11 Aircraft Section 10,667,100 12 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 32,946,900 13 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 4,926,400 14 Marine Enforcement 15 AST Facility Maintenance 6,896,400 16 and Operations 17 Village Public Safety Operations 26,070,100 26,045,100 25,000 18 Village Public Safety 26,066,000 19 Operations 20 VPSO Facility Maintenance 4,100 21 and Operations 22 Alaska Police Standards Council 1,609,700 1,609,700 23 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 25 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 26 Alaska Police Standards 1,580,700 27 Council 28 APSC Facility Maintenance 29,000 29 and Operations 30 Integrated Victim Assistance 36,284,600 18,711,900 17,572,700 31 Council on Domestic 30,542,900 01 Violence and Sexual Assault 02 Violent Crimes Compensation 2,716,600 03 Board 04 Victim Services 2,979,800 05 Administration and Support 06 IVA Facility Maintenance 45,300 07 and Operations 08 Statewide Support 60,414,900 41,393,300 19,021,600 09 Commissioner's Office 4,850,500 10 It is the intent of the legislature to direct public safety funds to areas of the state that do not 11 have the tax base to provide needed policing services to their communities. The Department 12 of Public Safety executives are urged to meet with officials from three organized, non-unified 13 boroughs in the state, Kenai Peninsula, Fairbanks North Star and Matanuska-Susitna, who do 14 not currently offer adequate local public safety services and encourage them to take the steps 15 necessary to police their respective boroughs rather than relying on the State to provide those 16 services. The Department shall submit a full response to the Co-chairs of the Finance 17 committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025, outlining the 18 communication, feedback or actions taken by each borough. 19 Training Academy 4,452,200 20 The amount allocated for the Training Academy includes the unexpended and unobligated 21 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 44.41.020(a). 22 Administrative Services 6,127,600 23 Alaska Public Safety 10,099,700 24 Communication Services 25 (APSCS) 26 Information Systems 4,894,200 27 Criminal Justice 15,835,500 28 Information Systems Program 29 The amount allocated for the Criminal Justice Information Systems Program includes the 30 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the 31 Department of Public Safety from the Alaska automated fingerprint system under AS 01 44.41.025(b). 02 Laboratory Services 10,968,500 03 SWS Facility Maintenance 3,186,700 04 and Operations 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 It is the intent of the legislature that the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation decommission 09 the Anchorage office and not establish or maintain any new office locations without 10 corresponding budget increments for that purpose. It is the further intent of the legislature that 11 the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation shall provide a report to the Co-chairs of the Finance 12 committee and the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025, that details any actual 13 expenditures to date related to the Anchorage office. 14 Taxation and Treasury 90,453,500 23,573,000 66,880,500 15 Tax Division 19,779,500 16 Treasury Division 13,092,800 17 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 18 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 19 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 20 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 21 Unclaimed Property 780,500 22 Alaska Retirement 11,853,700 23 Management Board 24 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 25 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 26 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 27 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 28 Alaska Retirement 35,000,000 29 Management Board Custody 30 and Management Fees 31 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 01 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 02 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 03 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 04 Permanent Fund Dividend 9,947,000 05 Division 06 The amount allocated for the Permanent Fund Dividend includes the unexpended and 07 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the Department of Revenue 08 for application fees for reimbursement of the cost of the Permanent Fund Dividend Division 09 charitable contributions program as provided under AS 43.23.130(f) and for coordination fees 10 provided under AS 43.23.130(m). 11 Child Support Enforcement 29,929,000 9,687,300 20,241,700 12 Child Support Enforcement 29,929,000 13 Division 14 The amount allocated for the Child Support Enforcement Division includes the unexpended 15 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the Department of 16 Revenue associated with collections for recipients of Temporary Assistance to Needy 17 Families and the Alaska Interest program. 18 Administration and Support 8,894,400 2,336,600 6,557,800 19 Commissioner's Office 1,588,100 20 Administrative Services 3,616,000 21 The amount allocated for the Administrative Services Division includes the unexpended and 22 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, not to exceed $300,000, of receipts collected by the 23 department's federally approved indirect cost allocation plan. 24 Criminal Investigations 1,473,800 25 Unit 26 State Facilities Rent 2,216,500 27 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 527,200 527,200 28 Mental Health Trust 30,000 29 Operations 30 Long Term Care Ombudsman 464,500 31 Office 01 Long Term Care Ombudsman 32,700 02 Office Facilities Rent 03 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority 1,412,200 1,412,200 04 AMBBA Operations 1,412,200 05 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 116,253,200 402,800 115,850,400 06 AHFC Operations 113,698,600 07 It is the intent of the Legislature that the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation study housing 08 development opportunities in the Chester Creek sports complex area of Anchorage. 09 Alaska Corporation for 520,400 10 Affordable Housing 11 Alaska Sustainable Energy 402,800 12 Corporation 13 Facilities Operations and 1,631,400 14 Maintenance 15 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 186,564,400 186,564,400 16 Investment Management Fees 17 APFC Investment Management 186,564,400 18 Fees 19 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 28,601,300 28,601,300 20 Juneau Office Operations 21 Alaska Permanent Fund 28,018,300 22 Corporation Juneau Office 23 Operations 24 Facilities Rent Non-State 583,000 25 Owned 26 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 100 100 27 Anchorage Office Operations 28 Alaska Permanent Fund 100 29 Corporation Anchorage 30 Office Operations 31 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 12,465,700 12,465,700 01 Information Technology and Software 02 Licensing 03 Alaska Permanent Fund 12,465,700 04 Corporation Information 05 Technology and Software 06 Licensing 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Division of Facilities Services 104,807,100 21,790,100 83,017,000 11 The amount allocated for this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 12 on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and 13 Public Facilities for the maintenance and operations of facilities and leases. 14 Facilities Services 59,199,100 15 Leases 45,608,000 16 Administration and Support 67,802,300 15,077,500 52,724,800 17 Data Modernization & 8,274,400 18 Innovation Office 19 Commissioner's Office 3,629,600 20 Contracting and Appeals 444,100 21 Equal Employment and Civil 1,534,300 22 Rights 23 The amount allocated for Equal Employment and Civil Rights includes the unexpended and 24 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the statutory designated program receipts collected 25 for the Alaska Construction Career Day events. 26 Internal Review 833,000 27 Statewide Administrative 13,458,100 28 Services 29 The amount allocated for Statewide Administrative Services includes the unexpended and 30 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under 31 the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities federal indirect cost plan for 01 expenditures incurred by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 02 Highway Safety Office 942,700 03 Information Systems and 7,623,000 04 Services 05 Leased Facilities 2,937,500 06 Statewide Procurement 3,373,800 07 Central Region Support 1,717,400 08 Services 09 Northern Region Support 2,529,100 10 Services 11 Southcoast Region Support 4,438,500 12 Services 13 Statewide Aviation 6,119,000 14 The amount allocated for Statewide Aviation includes the unexpended and unobligated 15 balance on June 30, 2025, of the rental receipts and user fees collected from tenants of land 16 and buildings at Department of Transportation and Public Facilities rural airports under AS 17 02.15.090(a). 18 Statewide Safety and 334,000 19 Emergency Management 20 Program Development and 823,100 21 Statewide Planning 22 Measurement Standards & 8,790,700 23 Commercial Vehicle 24 Compliance 25 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 26 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Unified Carrier 27 Registration Program receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public 28 Facilities. 29 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 30 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts 31 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 01 Design, Engineering and Construction 138,105,400 2,105,200 136,000,200 02 Central Design, 57,119,200 03 Engineering, and 04 Construction 05 The amount allocated for Central Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes the 06 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program receipts 07 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or lease of 08 excess right-of-way. 09 Southcoast Design, 22,733,200 10 Engineering, and 11 Construction 12 The amount allocated for Southcoast Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 13 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program 14 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 15 lease of excess right-of-way. 16 Project Delivery 14,832,500 17 Northern Region Design, 43,420,500 18 Engineering, and 19 Construction 20 The amount allocated for Northern Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 21 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program 22 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 23 lease of excess right-of-way. 24 State Equipment Fleet 40,032,400 30,500 40,001,900 25 State Equipment Fleet 40,032,400 26 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 172,061,400 127,251,200 44,810,200 27 The amounts allocated for highways and aviation shall lapse into the general fund on August 28 31, 2026. 29 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2025, of general fund program receipts collected by the Department of 31 Transportation and Public Facilities for collections related to the repair of damaged state 01 highway infrastructure. 02 Abandoned Vehicle Removal 100,000 03 Statewide Contracted Snow 915,500 04 Removal 05 Traffic Signal Management 2,389,100 06 Central Region Highways and 47,945,600 07 Aviation 08 Northern Region Highways 84,165,300 09 and Aviation 10 It is the intent of the legislature that the agency shall provide a report detailing the feasibility 11 of designating the Dalton Highway an Industrial Use Highway in order to collect fees to 12 address the road's maintenance. This report shall be provided to the Co-chairs of the Finance 13 committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 20, 2025. 14 Southcoast Region Highways 27,571,000 15 and Aviation 16 Whittier Access and Tunnel 8,974,900 17 The amount allocated for Whittier Access and Tunnel includes the unexpended and 18 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Whittier Tunnel toll receipts collected by the 19 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 19.05.040(11). 20 International Airports 128,382,800 128,382,800 21 International Airport 8,804,800 22 Systems Office 23 Anchorage Airport 7,282,500 24 Administration 25 Anchorage Airport 30,258,600 26 Facilities 27 Anchorage Airport Field and 27,152,400 28 Equipment Maintenance 29 Anchorage Airport 9,599,000 30 Operations 31 Anchorage Airport Safety 18,809,600 01 Fairbanks Airport 2,706,300 02 Administration 03 Fairbanks Airport 5,921,400 04 Facilities 05 Fairbanks Airport Field and 7,363,200 06 Equipment Maintenance 07 Fairbanks Airport 2,355,200 08 Operations 09 Fairbanks Airport Safety 8,129,800 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 University of Alaska 1,095,683,600 663,584,800 432,098,800 14 It is the intent of the legislature that the University of Alaska provide two reports detailing all 15 transfers of funds from rural campus allocations to main campus allocations during the fiscal 16 year ending June 30th, 2026, to the Co-Chairs of the Finance Committees and the Legislative 17 Finance Division. This should include an interim report due Match 31st, 2026, and a final 18 report by September 30th, 2026. 19 Budget Reductions/Additions -8,765,100 20 - Systemwide 21 Systemwide Services 41,803,500 22 Systemwide Services 4,980,000 23 Facility Operations and 24 Maintenance State Owned 25 Office of Information 21,757,600 26 Technology 27 Anchorage Campus 256,268,900 28 Anchorage Campus Facility 26,011,300 29 Operations and Maintenance 30 State Owned 31 Small Business Development 3,701,400 01 Center 02 Kenai Peninsula College 15,612,200 03 Kenai Peninsula College 2,032,200 04 Facility Operations and 05 Maintenance State Owned 06 Kodiak College 5,110,700 07 Kodiak College Facility 903,900 08 Operations and Maintenance 09 State Owned 10 Matanuska-Susitna College 13,040,500 11 Matanuska-Susitna College 1,456,800 12 Facility Operations and 13 Maintenance State Owned 14 Prince William Sound 5,561,100 15 College 16 Prince William Sound 1,237,800 17 College Facility Operations 18 and Maintenance State Owned 19 Troth Yeddha' Campus 483,934,400 20 Troth Yeddha' Campus 106,066,800 21 Facility Operations and 22 Maintenance State Owned 23 College of Indigenous 8,763,300 24 Studies 25 College of Indigenous 637,800 26 Studies Facility Operations 27 and Maintenance State Owned 28 Bristol Bay Campus 3,846,200 29 Bristol Bay Campus Facility 248,100 30 Operations and Maintenance 31 State Owned 01 Chukchi Campus 2,123,500 02 Chukchi Campus Facility 178,100 03 Operations and Maintenance 04 State Owned 05 Kuskokwim Campus 5,747,100 06 Kuskokwim Campus Facility 356,200 07 Operations and Maintenance 08 State Owned 09 Northwest Campus 4,696,500 10 Northwest Campus Facility 182,800 11 Operations and Maintenance 12 State Owned 13 UAF Community and Technical 16,982,600 14 College 15 UAF Community & Technical 1,361,700 16 College Facility Operations 17 & Maintenance State Owned 18 Education Trust of Alaska 9,026,800 19 Juneau Campus 41,655,200 20 Juneau Campus Facility 5,949,500 21 Operations and Maintenance 22 State Owned 23 Ketchikan Campus 4,872,500 24 Ketchikan Campus Facility 605,300 25 Operations and Maintenance 26 State Owned 27 Sitka Campus 5,794,600 28 Sitka Campus Facility 1,941,800 29 Operations and Maintenance 30 State Owned 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 Alaska Court System 147,117,800 143,881,800 3,236,000 04 Appellate Courts 10,151,200 05 Trial Courts 122,283,900 06 Administration and Support 14,682,700 07 Therapeutic Courts 4,484,200 3,363,200 1,121,000 08 Therapeutic Courts 4,484,200 09 Commission on Judicial Conduct 577,900 577,900 10 Commission on Judicial 577,900 11 Conduct 12 Judicial Council 1,675,900 1,675,900 13 Judicial Council 1,675,900 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Legislature * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Budget and Audit Committee 19,812,200 19,812,200 18 Legislative Audit 8,225,900 19 Legislative Finance 9,516,600 20 Budget and Audit Committee 2,069,700 21 Expenses 22 Legislative Council 33,032,900 32,597,300 435,600 23 Administrative Services 8,570,400 24 Council and Subcommittees 821,700 25 Legal and Research Services 6,731,100 26 Select Committee on Ethics 370,300 27 Office of Victims' Rights 1,475,200 28 Ombudsman 1,864,600 29 Legislature State 1,640,500 30 Facilities Rent 31 Technology and Information 9,811,400 01 Services Division 02 Security Services 1,747,700 03 Legislative Operating Budget 38,194,200 38,174,200 20,000 04 Legislators' Salaries and 9,599,700 05 Allowances 06 Legislative Operating 13,343,600 07 Budget 08 Session Expenses 15,250,900 09 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 3 of this Act to the state agencies named and for the 03 purposes set out in the new legislation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending 04 June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. The appropriations in this section fund legislation 05 assumed to have passed during the first regular session of the thirty-fourth legislature. If a 06 measure listed in this section fails to pass and its substance is not incorporated in some other 07 measure, or is vetoed by the governor, the appropriation for that measure shall be reduced 08 accordingly. 09 Appropriation 10 HB 57 SCHOOLS: COMM. DEVICES/CLASS SIZE/FUNDING 11 Department of Education and Early Development 12 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 13 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 14 1007 I/A Rcpts 494,600 15 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 16 Commissioner and Administrative Services 17 Labor Market Information 18 1004 Gen Fund 31,600 19 Legislature 20 Legislative Council 21 Council and Subcommittees 22 1004 Gen Fund 80,000 23 HB 174 REAA FUND: MT. EDGECUMBE, TEACHER HOUSING 24 Department of Education and Early Development 25 Education Support and Admin Services 26 School Finance & Facilities 27 1004 Gen Fund 313,300 28 SB 54 ARCH, ENG, SURVEYORS; REG INT DESIGN 29 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 30 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 31 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 01 1156 Rcpt Svcs 172,600 02 SB 95 CHILD CARE: ASSISTANCE/GRANTS 03 Department of Health 04 Public Assistance 05 Child Care Benefits 06 1002 Fed Rcpts 225,100 07 1003 GF/Match 225,100 08 1004 Gen Fund 5,642,000 09 SB 97 BIG GAME GUIDE PERMIT PROGRAM 10 Department of Natural Resources 11 Fire Suppression, Land & Water Resources 12 Mining, Land & Water 13 1005 GF/Prgm 341,600 14 SB 113 APPORTION TAXABLE INCOME;DIGITAL BUSINESS 15 Department of Revenue 16 Taxation and Treasury 17 Tax Division 18 1004 Gen Fund 261,800 19 *** Total New Legislation Funding *** 7,787,700 20 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Department of Administration 06 1002 Federal Receipts 594,600 0 594,600 07 1003 General Fund Match 250,000 0 250,000 08 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 92,126,800 0 92,126,800 09 Receipts 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 35,373,100 0 35,373,100 11 1007 Interagency Receipts 80,841,500 0 80,841,500 12 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 43,269,900 0 43,269,900 13 Fund 14 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 225,600 0 225,600 15 1029 Public Employees Retirement 10,718,000 0 10,718,000 16 Trust Fund 17 1033 Surplus Federal Property 703,800 0 703,800 18 Revolving Fund 19 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 4,107,100 0 4,107,100 20 1042 Judicial Retirement System 125,500 0 125,500 21 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 306,100 0 306,100 22 Retirement System 23 1081 Information Services Fund 65,567,700 0 65,567,700 24 1108 Statutory Designated Program 1,571,600 0 1,571,600 25 Receipts 26 *** Total Agency Funding *** 335,781,300 0 335,781,300 27 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 28 1002 Federal Receipts 42,563,700 0 42,563,700 29 1003 General Fund Match 1,313,800 0 1,313,800 30 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 15,408,900 0 15,408,900 31 Receipts 01 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 12,223,100 0 12,223,100 02 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,272,200 0 17,272,200 03 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,224,500 0 5,224,500 04 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 319,000 0 319,000 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project 17,274,000 0 17,274,000 06 Receipts 07 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,039,900 0 1,039,900 08 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving 738,500 0 738,500 09 Loan Fund 10 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 66,700 0 66,700 11 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & 10,072,200 0 10,072,200 12 Export Authority Receipts 13 1107 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 0 1,199,000 14 Corporate Receipts 15 1108 Statutory Designated Program 13,906,400 0 13,906,400 16 Receipts 17 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 10,762,500 0 10,762,500 18 Receipts 19 1156 Receipt Supported Services 27,013,600 172,600 27,186,200 20 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation 9,116,600 0 9,116,600 21 Commission Receipts 22 1164 Rural Development Initiative 70,200 0 70,200 23 Fund 24 1169 Power Cost Equalization 630,200 0 630,200 25 Endowment Fund 26 1170 Small Business Economic 66,300 0 66,300 27 Development Revolving Loan Fund 28 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 0 80,000 29 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,464,100 0 1,464,100 30 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 250,000 0 250,000 31 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 312,600 0 312,600 01 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 22,400 0 22,400 02 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 22,800 0 22,800 03 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan 11,200 0 11,200 04 Fund 05 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 3,243,200 0 3,243,200 06 Project Fund 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 191,687,600 172,600 191,860,200 08 Department of Corrections 09 1002 Federal Receipts 9,191,200 0 9,191,200 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 427,945,900 0 427,945,900 11 Receipts 12 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,139,500 0 7,139,500 13 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,128,700 0 17,128,700 14 1171 Restorative Justice Account 11,076,700 0 11,076,700 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 472,482,000 0 472,482,000 16 Department of Education and Early Development 17 1002 Federal Receipts 245,735,300 0 245,735,300 18 1003 General Fund Match 1,369,200 0 1,369,200 19 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 97,132,200 313,300 97,445,500 20 Receipts 21 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,148,500 0 2,148,500 22 1007 Interagency Receipts 25,128,600 494,600 25,623,200 23 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee 533,800 0 533,800 24 Account 25 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 20,791,000 0 20,791,000 26 Schools 27 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 10,858,400 0 10,858,400 28 Receipts 29 1108 Statutory Designated Program 2,805,600 0 2,805,600 30 Receipts 31 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 0 30,000 01 1226 Alaska Higher Education 31,347,200 0 31,347,200 02 Investment Fund 03 *** Total Agency Funding *** 437,879,800 807,900 438,687,700 04 Department of Environmental Conservation 05 1002 Federal Receipts 44,981,500 0 44,981,500 06 1003 General Fund Match 6,634,900 0 6,634,900 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 17,338,500 0 17,338,500 08 Receipts 09 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 8,756,700 0 8,756,700 10 1007 Interagency Receipts 4,682,400 0 4,682,400 11 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 7,200 0 7,200 12 Civil 13 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention 16,131,800 0 16,131,800 14 & Response Fund 15 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 429,800 0 429,800 16 Waste 17 1061 Capital Improvement Project 6,407,700 0 6,407,700 18 Receipts 19 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 7,903,400 0 7,903,400 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program 30,000 0 30,000 21 Receipts 22 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel 1,696,000 0 1,696,000 23 Environmental Compliance Fund 24 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger 2,198,400 0 2,198,400 25 Program 26 1230 Alaska Clean Water 1,082,100 0 1,082,100 27 Administrative Fund 28 1231 Alaska Drinking Water 1,074,700 0 1,074,700 29 Administrative Fund 30 *** Total Agency Funding *** 119,355,100 0 119,355,100 31 Department of Family and Community Services 01 1002 Federal Receipts 88,225,500 0 88,225,500 02 1003 General Fund Match 93,600,100 0 93,600,100 03 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 151,642,300 0 151,642,300 04 Receipts 05 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 32,302,600 0 32,302,600 06 1007 Interagency Receipts 93,792,400 0 93,792,400 07 1061 Capital Improvement Project 773,600 0 773,600 08 Receipts 09 1108 Statutory Designated Program 13,169,400 0 13,169,400 10 Receipts 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 473,505,900 0 473,505,900 12 Department of Fish and Game 13 1002 Federal Receipts 94,760,000 0 94,760,000 14 1003 General Fund Match 1,306,000 0 1,306,000 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 73,802,700 0 73,802,700 16 Receipts 17 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,646,500 0 2,646,500 18 1007 Interagency Receipts 27,489,200 0 27,489,200 19 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 2,592,300 0 2,592,300 20 Civil 21 1024 Fish and Game Fund 43,444,800 0 43,444,800 22 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 126,300 0 126,300 23 Waste 24 1061 Capital Improvement Project 6,151,900 0 6,151,900 25 Receipts 26 1108 Statutory Designated Program 9,842,900 0 9,842,900 27 Receipts 28 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,730,900 0 3,730,900 29 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry 7,252,700 0 7,252,700 30 Commission Receipts 31 *** Total Agency Funding *** 273,146,200 0 273,146,200 01 Office of the Governor 02 1002 Federal Receipts 151,900 0 151,900 03 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 30,575,800 0 30,575,800 04 Receipts 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project 432,600 0 432,600 06 Receipts 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 31,160,300 0 31,160,300 08 Department of Health 09 1002 Federal Receipts 2,601,994,000 225,100 2,602,219,100 10 1003 General Fund Match 825,926,800 225,100 826,151,900 11 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 113,177,600 5,642,000 118,819,600 12 Receipts 13 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 13,827,100 0 13,827,100 14 1007 Interagency Receipts 50,477,300 0 50,477,300 15 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 17,791,500 0 17,791,500 16 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,463,500 0 2,463,500 17 Receipts 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program 32,866,900 0 32,866,900 19 Receipts 20 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 5,257,600 0 5,257,600 21 Cessation Fund 22 1171 Restorative Justice Account 420,600 0 420,600 23 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 0 219,800 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,664,422,700 6,092,200 3,670,514,900 25 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 26 1002 Federal Receipts 98,454,700 0 98,454,700 27 1003 General Fund Match 9,099,800 0 9,099,800 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 14,284,800 31,600 14,316,400 29 Receipts 30 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,254,000 0 6,254,000 31 1007 Interagency Receipts 16,208,800 0 16,208,800 01 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve 2,902,500 0 2,902,500 02 Account 03 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,475,400 0 1,475,400 04 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,300 0 817,300 05 1054 Employment Assistance and 10,040,100 0 10,040,100 06 Training Program Account 07 1061 Capital Improvement Project 225,300 0 225,300 08 Receipts 09 1108 Statutory Designated Program 1,562,800 0 1,562,800 10 Receipts 11 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business 124,200 0 124,200 12 Fund 13 1151 Technical Vocational Education 655,800 0 655,800 14 Program Account 15 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation 8,381,000 0 8,381,000 16 Administration Account 17 1172 Building Safety Account 2,231,200 0 2,231,200 18 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits 805,100 0 805,100 19 Guaranty Fund 20 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business 140,000 0 140,000 21 Enterprise Revolving Fund 22 *** Total Agency Funding *** 173,662,800 31,600 173,694,400 23 Department of Law 24 1002 Federal Receipts 2,508,000 0 2,508,000 25 1003 General Fund Match 649,900 0 649,900 26 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 83,432,200 0 83,432,200 27 Receipts 28 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 196,300 0 196,300 29 1007 Interagency Receipts 36,738,300 0 36,738,300 30 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 598,700 0 598,700 31 Waste 01 1061 Capital Improvement Project 506,500 0 506,500 02 Receipts 03 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 3,131,800 0 3,131,800 04 Receipts 05 1108 Statutory Designated Program 2,064,700 0 2,064,700 06 Receipts 07 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 2,786,800 0 2,786,800 08 Receipts 09 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 94,600 0 94,600 10 Cessation Fund 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 132,707,800 0 132,707,800 12 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 13 1002 Federal Receipts 35,220,500 0 35,220,500 14 1003 General Fund Match 9,382,000 0 9,382,000 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 8,679,700 0 8,679,700 16 Receipts 17 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 28,500 0 28,500 18 1007 Interagency Receipts 6,901,700 0 6,901,700 19 1061 Capital Improvement Project 3,915,100 0 3,915,100 20 Receipts 21 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 2,919,400 0 2,919,400 22 Fund 23 1108 Statutory Designated Program 643,400 0 643,400 24 Receipts 25 *** Total Agency Funding *** 67,690,300 0 67,690,300 26 Department of Natural Resources 27 1002 Federal Receipts 17,985,600 0 17,985,600 28 1003 General Fund Match 939,900 0 939,900 29 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 72,354,600 0 72,354,600 30 Receipts 31 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 36,651,400 341,600 36,993,000 01 1007 Interagency Receipts 16,433,700 0 16,433,700 02 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 173,800 0 173,800 03 Civil 04 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 339,800 0 339,800 05 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 51,500 0 51,500 06 Waste 07 1061 Capital Improvement Project 8,780,600 0 8,780,600 08 Receipts 09 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 7,636,300 0 7,636,300 10 Receipts 11 1108 Statutory Designated Program 14,675,500 0 14,675,500 12 Receipts 13 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 5,893,400 0 5,893,400 14 1154 Shore Fisheries Development 539,700 0 539,700 15 Lease Program 16 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 0 1,550,900 17 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 6,472,300 0 6,472,300 18 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 558,200 0 558,200 19 Project Fund I/A 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 191,037,200 341,600 191,378,800 21 Department of Public Safety 22 1002 Federal Receipts 41,257,100 0 41,257,100 23 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 280,932,000 0 280,932,000 24 Receipts 25 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,718,100 0 7,718,100 26 1007 Interagency Receipts 11,312,400 0 11,312,400 27 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,449,300 0 2,449,300 28 Receipts 29 1108 Statutory Designated Program 204,400 0 204,400 30 Receipts 31 1171 Restorative Justice Account 420,600 0 420,600 01 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,682,500 0 1,682,500 02 *** Total Agency Funding *** 345,976,400 0 345,976,400 03 Department of Revenue 04 1002 Federal Receipts 90,659,400 0 90,659,400 05 1003 General Fund Match 8,767,400 0 8,767,400 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 24,558,400 261,800 24,820,200 07 Receipts 08 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,260,000 0 2,260,000 09 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,216,400 0 15,216,400 10 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,037,400 0 2,037,400 11 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 22,301,800 0 22,301,800 12 Fund 13 1027 International Airports Revenue 225,900 0 225,900 14 Fund 15 1029 Public Employees Retirement 16,495,800 0 16,495,800 16 Trust Fund 17 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 7,668,800 0 7,668,800 18 1042 Judicial Retirement System 366,500 0 366,500 19 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 241,100 0 241,100 20 Retirement System 21 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 10,075,800 0 10,075,800 22 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,984,100 0 2,984,100 23 Receipts 24 1066 Public School Trust Fund 838,400 0 838,400 25 1103 Alaska Housing Finance 39,728,300 0 39,728,300 26 Corporation Receipts 27 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank 1,307,200 0 1,307,200 28 Receipts 29 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 227,481,100 0 227,481,100 30 Receipts 31 1108 Statutory Designated Program 355,000 0 355,000 01 Receipts 02 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 1,116,800 0 1,116,800 03 Reimbursement 04 1226 Alaska Higher Education 413,900 0 413,900 05 Investment Fund 06 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 0 1,500 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 475,101,000 261,800 475,362,800 08 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 09 1002 Federal Receipts 5,599,900 0 5,599,900 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 110,421,100 0 110,421,100 11 Receipts 12 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,533,100 0 6,533,100 13 1007 Interagency Receipts 61,028,700 0 61,028,700 14 1026 Highways Equipment Working 40,953,000 0 40,953,000 15 Capital Fund 16 1027 International Airports Revenue 129,298,100 0 129,298,100 17 Fund 18 1061 Capital Improvement Project 213,176,300 0 213,176,300 19 Receipts 20 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System 2,193,800 0 2,193,800 21 Fund 22 1108 Statutory Designated Program 402,000 0 402,000 23 Receipts 24 1147 Public Building Fund 15,812,500 0 15,812,500 25 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 8,739,300 0 8,739,300 26 1213 Alaska Housing Capital 1,253,900 0 1,253,900 27 Corporation 28 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,838,100 0 1,838,100 29 1215 Unified Carrier Registration 869,700 0 869,700 30 Receipts 31 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 4,919,400 0 4,919,400 01 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,335,000 0 9,335,000 02 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 281,100 0 281,100 03 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 37,113,300 0 37,113,300 04 1276 Derelict Vessel Prevention 1,423,100 0 1,423,100 05 Program Fund 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 651,191,400 0 651,191,400 07 University of Alaska 08 1002 Federal Receipts 214,820,800 0 214,820,800 09 1003 General Fund Match 4,777,300 0 4,777,300 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 345,880,100 0 345,880,100 11 Receipts 12 1007 Interagency Receipts 11,116,000 0 11,116,000 13 1048 University of Alaska Restricted 312,926,400 0 312,926,400 14 Receipts 15 1061 Capital Improvement Project 4,181,000 0 4,181,000 16 Receipts 17 1108 Statutory Designated Program 68,360,000 0 68,360,000 18 Receipts 19 1174 University of Alaska Intra- 133,621,000 0 133,621,000 20 Agency Transfers 21 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 0 1,000 22 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,095,683,600 0 1,095,683,600 23 Judiciary 24 1002 Federal Receipts 1,466,000 0 1,466,000 25 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 149,498,800 0 149,498,800 26 Receipts 27 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,216,700 0 2,216,700 28 1108 Statutory Designated Program 335,000 0 335,000 29 Receipts 30 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 339,300 0 339,300 31 Reimbursement 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 153,855,800 0 153,855,800 02 Legislature 03 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 89,928,400 80,000 90,008,400 04 Receipts 05 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 655,300 0 655,300 06 1007 Interagency Receipts 35,000 0 35,000 07 1171 Restorative Justice Account 420,600 0 420,600 08 *** Total Agency Funding *** 91,039,300 80,000 91,119,300 09 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 9,377,366,500 7,787,700 9,385,154,200 10 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Unrestricted General 06 1003 General Fund Match 964,017,100 225,100 964,242,200 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 2,199,120,800 6,328,700 2,205,449,500 08 Receipts 09 1213 Alaska Housing Capital 1,253,900 0 1,253,900 10 Corporation 11 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 3,164,391,800 6,553,800 3,170,945,600 12 Designated General 13 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 174,713,800 341,600 175,055,400 14 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 339,800 0 339,800 15 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve 2,902,500 0 2,902,500 16 Account 17 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,475,400 0 1,475,400 18 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,224,500 0 5,224,500 19 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 319,000 0 319,000 20 1048 University of Alaska Restricted 312,926,400 0 312,926,400 21 Receipts 22 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,300 0 817,300 23 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention 16,131,800 0 16,131,800 24 & Response Fund 25 1054 Employment Assistance and 10,040,100 0 10,040,100 26 Training Program Account 27 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,039,900 0 1,039,900 28 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving 738,500 0 738,500 29 Loan Fund 30 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 66,700 0 66,700 31 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System 2,193,800 0 2,193,800 01 Fund 02 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,730,900 0 3,730,900 03 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 13,549,300 0 13,549,300 04 Receipts 05 1151 Technical Vocational Education 655,800 0 655,800 06 Program Account 07 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 5,893,400 0 5,893,400 08 1154 Shore Fisheries Development 539,700 0 539,700 09 Lease Program 10 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 0 1,550,900 11 1156 Receipt Supported Services 27,013,600 172,600 27,186,200 12 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation 8,381,000 0 8,381,000 13 Administration Account 14 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation 9,116,600 0 9,116,600 15 Commission Receipts 16 1164 Rural Development Initiative 70,200 0 70,200 17 Fund 18 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 5,352,200 0 5,352,200 19 Cessation Fund 20 1169 Power Cost Equalization 630,200 0 630,200 21 Endowment Fund 22 1170 Small Business Economic 66,300 0 66,300 23 Development Revolving Loan Fund 24 1172 Building Safety Account 2,231,200 0 2,231,200 25 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 15,211,600 0 15,211,600 26 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry 7,252,700 0 7,252,700 27 Commission Receipts 28 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 0 80,000 29 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits 805,100 0 805,100 30 Guaranty Fund 31 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,464,100 0 1,464,100 01 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 312,600 0 312,600 02 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 22,400 0 22,400 03 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 22,800 0 22,800 04 1226 Alaska Higher Education 31,761,100 0 31,761,100 05 Investment Fund 06 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan 11,200 0 11,200 07 Fund 08 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 0 1,000 09 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business 140,000 0 140,000 10 Enterprise Revolving Fund 11 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 0 219,800 12 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 37,113,300 0 37,113,300 13 *** Total Designated General *** 702,128,500 514,200 702,642,700 14 Other Non-Duplicated 15 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 65,571,700 0 65,571,700 16 Fund 17 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 2,773,300 0 2,773,300 18 Civil 19 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 225,600 0 225,600 20 1024 Fish and Game Fund 43,444,800 0 43,444,800 21 1027 International Airports Revenue 129,524,000 0 129,524,000 22 Fund 23 1029 Public Employees Retirement 27,213,800 0 27,213,800 24 Trust Fund 25 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 11,775,900 0 11,775,900 26 1042 Judicial Retirement System 492,000 0 492,000 27 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 547,200 0 547,200 28 Retirement System 29 1066 Public School Trust Fund 838,400 0 838,400 30 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 7,903,400 0 7,903,400 31 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 2,919,400 0 2,919,400 01 Fund 02 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & 10,072,200 0 10,072,200 03 Export Authority Receipts 04 1103 Alaska Housing Finance 39,728,300 0 39,728,300 05 Corporation Receipts 06 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank 1,307,200 0 1,307,200 07 Receipts 08 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 238,249,200 0 238,249,200 09 Receipts 10 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 10,858,400 0 10,858,400 11 Receipts 12 1107 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 0 1,199,000 13 Corporate Receipts 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program 162,795,600 0 162,795,600 15 Receipts 16 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business 124,200 0 124,200 17 Fund 18 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel 1,696,000 0 1,696,000 19 Environmental Compliance Fund 20 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger 2,198,400 0 2,198,400 21 Program 22 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,838,100 0 1,838,100 23 1215 Unified Carrier Registration 869,700 0 869,700 24 Receipts 25 1230 Alaska Clean Water 1,082,100 0 1,082,100 26 Administrative Fund 27 1231 Alaska Drinking Water 1,074,700 0 1,074,700 28 Administrative Fund 29 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 4,919,400 0 4,919,400 30 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,335,000 0 9,335,000 31 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 0 1,500 01 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 780,578,500 0 780,578,500 02 Federal Receipts 03 1002 Federal Receipts 3,636,169,700 225,100 3,636,394,800 04 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee 533,800 0 533,800 05 Account 06 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,037,400 0 2,037,400 07 1033 Surplus Federal Property 703,800 0 703,800 08 Revolving Fund 09 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 20,791,000 0 20,791,000 10 Schools 11 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 1,456,100 0 1,456,100 12 Reimbursement 13 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 3,661,691,800 225,100 3,661,916,900 14 Other Duplicated 15 1007 Interagency Receipts 494,020,000 494,600 494,514,600 16 1026 Highways Equipment Working 40,953,000 0 40,953,000 17 Capital Fund 18 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 27,867,300 0 27,867,300 19 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 1,206,300 0 1,206,300 20 Waste 21 1061 Capital Improvement Project 269,721,500 0 269,721,500 22 Receipts 23 1081 Information Services Fund 65,567,700 0 65,567,700 24 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 0 30,000 25 1147 Public Building Fund 15,812,500 0 15,812,500 26 1171 Restorative Justice Account 12,338,500 0 12,338,500 27 1174 University of Alaska Intra- 133,621,000 0 133,621,000 28 Agency Transfers 29 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 250,000 0 250,000 30 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,682,500 0 1,682,500 31 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 3,243,200 0 3,243,200 01 Project Fund 02 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 558,200 0 558,200 03 Project Fund I/A 04 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 281,100 0 281,100 05 1276 Derelict Vessel Prevention 1,423,100 0 1,423,100 06 Program Fund 07 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 1,068,575,900 494,600 1,069,070,500 08 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 6 of this Act to the agencies named for the purposes 03 expressed for the calendar year beginning January 1, 2026 and ending December 31, 2026, 04 unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Marine Highway System 170,780,100 86,852,600 83,927,500 11 Marine Vessel Operations 125,959,000 12 Marine Vessel Fuel 21,968,400 13 Marine Engineering 3,317,700 14 Overhaul 1,699,600 15 Reservations and Marketing 1,525,600 16 Marine Shore Operations 10,264,700 17 Vessel Operations 6,045,100 18 Management 19 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 05 1002 Federal Receipts 82,921,200 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 66,098,300 07 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 1,006,300 08 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 20,754,300 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 170,780,100 10 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 170,780,100 11 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 66,098,300 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 66,098,300 07 Designated General 08 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 20,754,300 09 *** Total Designated General *** 20,754,300 10 Federal Receipts 11 1002 Federal Receipts 82,921,200 12 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 82,921,200 13 Other Duplicated 14 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 1,006,300 15 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 1,006,300 16 (SECTION 8 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 8. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 9 of this Act to the agencies named for the purposes 03 expressed for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2025, unless 04 otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 30,000 30,000 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 30,000 13 Conservation Commission 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Facility-Capital Improvement Unit 84,700 84,700 18 Facility-Capital 84,700 19 Improvement Unit 20 Administration and Support 86,100 86,100 21 Information Technology MIS 86,100 22 Population Management 3,547,400 11,047,400 -7,500,000 23 Institution Director's 3,352,400 24 Office 25 Anchorage Correctional 0 26 Complex 27 Regional and Community 195,000 28 Jails 29 Community Residential Centers 2,034,800 2,034,800 30 Community Residential 2,034,800 31 Centers 01 Electronic Monitoring 134,200 134,200 02 Electronic Monitoring 134,200 03 Health and Rehabilitation Services 2,767,500 2,767,500 04 Physical Health Care 2,721,700 05 Behavioral Health Care 45,800 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Education Support and Admin Services 42,400 42,400 10 Student and School 42,400 11 Achievement 12 Student Financial Aid Programs 975,000 975,000 13 Alaska Performance 650,000 14 Scholarship Awards 15 Alaska Education Grants 325,000 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 3,000,000 3,000,000 20 Alaska Psychiatric 3,000,000 21 Institute 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 50,000 50,000 26 State Subsistence Research 50,000 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Behavioral Health 3,100,000 3,100,000 31 Behavioral Health Treatment 3,100,000 01 and Recovery Grants 02 Public Assistance 5,000,000 5,000,000 03 Energy Assistance Program 5,000,000 04 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 14,200,000 214,399,000 05 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Commissioner and Administrative 518,500 518,500 10 Services 11 Workforce Investment Board 518,500 12 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 839,900 839,900 13 Alaska Vocational Technical 839,900 14 Center 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Agriculture 3,200,000 3,200,000 19 Agricultural Development 3,200,000 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Taxation and Treasury 536,200 536,200 24 Alaska Retirement 512,900 25 Management Board 26 Permanent Fund Dividend 23,300 27 Division 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 620,400 620,400 01 Central Region Highways and 165,700 02 Aviation 03 Northern Region Highways 454,700 04 and Aviation 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 University of Alaska 133,327,500 -28,282,500 161,610,000 09 Budget Reductions/Additions 317,500 10 - Systemwide 11 Systemwide Services 15,520,000 12 Anchorage Campus 2,790,000 13 Fairbanks Campus 114,480,000 14 Juneau Campus 220,000 15 (SECTION 9 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 9. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 8 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 30,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 30,000 07 Department of Corrections 08 1002 Federal Receipts -7,500,000 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 16,154,700 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 8,654,700 11 Department of Education and Early Development 12 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 42,400 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,017,400 15 Department of Family and Community Services 16 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 3,000,000 17 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,000,000 18 Department of Fish and Game 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 50,000 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 50,000 21 Department of Health 22 1002 Federal Receipts 222,499,000 23 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 236,699,000 25 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 26 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program Account 660,000 27 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 698,400 28 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,358,400 29 Department of Natural Resources 30 1002 Federal Receipts 3,200,000 31 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,200,000 01 Department of Revenue 02 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 03 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 04 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 05 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 06 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 536,200 08 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 09 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 620,400 11 University of Alaska 12 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 13 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,110,000 14 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 317,500 15 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 133,327,500 17 Judiciary 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,586,300 19 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 20 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 388,493,600 21 (SECTION 10 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 10. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 8 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 29,741,000 07 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 08 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 33,354,700 09 Designated General 10 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 11 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program Account 660,000 12 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 1,058,300 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 14 *** Total Designated General *** -25,906,700 15 Other Non-Duplicated 16 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 17 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 18 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 19 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,160,000 21 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 22 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 80,293,300 23 Federal Receipts 24 1002 Federal Receipts 218,229,000 25 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 218,229,000 26 Other Duplicated 27 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 28 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 29 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 82,523,300 30 (SECTION 11 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 11. SUPPLEMENTAL ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) 02 Section 14(b), ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, as amended by sec. 20, ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, and sec. 11(a), 03 ch. 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 04 (b) The amount of federal receipts received for the support of rental relief, 05 homeless programs, or other housing programs provided under federal stimulus 06 legislation, estimated to be $131,000,000 [$127,000,000], is appropriated to the 07 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for that purpose for the fiscal years ending 08 June 30, 2021, June 30, 2022, June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, 09 and June 30, 2026. 10 (b) Section 60(g), ch. 11, SLA 2022, as amended by sec. 11(b), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 11 amended to read: 12 (g) Designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) received by the 13 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, estimated to be $40,000,000, for administration 14 of housing and energy programs on behalf of a municipality, tribal housing authority, 15 or other third party are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for 16 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, and 17 June 30, 2026. 18 * Sec. 12. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. (a) After the 19 appropriations made in secs. 34(c) and (d), ch. 7, SLA 2024, the unexpended and unobligated 20 balance of any general fund appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the 21 end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, not to exceed $30,000,000, is appropriated to the 22 major maintenance grant fund (AS 14.11.007). 23 (b) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of 24 $50,000,000 in the state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)), after the 25 appropriations made in secs. 34(c) and (d), ch. 7, SLA 2024, and (a) of this section, is 26 appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any appropriation that is 27 determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to the 28 state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)). 29 (c) The amount necessary to fund corrective contributions to retirement accounts, not 30 to exceed $2,679,460, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 31 Administration, division of retirement and benefits, for that purpose for the fiscal years ending 01 June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026. 02 * Sec. 13. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND 03 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. (a) The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the general 04 fund to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska 05 seafood marketing institute, for a comprehensive marketing plan for the fiscal years ending 06 June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 07 (b) Section 35(l), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 08 (l) The sum of $140,000 [$150,000] is appropriated from the general fund to 09 the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment 10 as a grant under AS 37.05.316 to Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska for Arctic Winter 11 Games events for the fiscal years [YEAR] ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026. 12 * Sec. 14. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. Section 38(b), ch. 13 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 14 (b) Statutory designated program receipts received for fisheries disasters 15 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $0, are appropriated to the 16 Department of Fish and Game for fisheries disaster relief for the fiscal years ending 17 June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 18 * Sec. 15. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) Section 60(d), ch. 1, 19 SSSLA 2021, as amended by secs. 23(b) and 67(x), ch. 11, SLA 2022, is amended to read: 20 (d) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from federal receipts received 21 from sec. 9901, P.L. 117-2 (Subtitle M—Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery 22 Funds, American Rescue Plan Act of 2021) to the Department of Health [AND 23 SOCIAL SERVICES], division of public health, emergency programs, for responding 24 to public health matters arising from COVID-19 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 25 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 26 (b) Section 62(b), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended to read: 27 (b) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2023, not to exceed 28 $750,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 23, line 10, and 29 allocated on page 23, line 13 (Department of Health, departmental support services, 30 commissioner's office - $8,401,500), is reappropriated to the Department of Health, 31 departmental support services, commissioner's office, for homeless management 01 information systems for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, 02 and June 30, 2026, from the following sources: 03 (1) $375,000 from statutory designated program receipts; 04 (2) the remaining amount, not to exceed $375,000, from the general fund. 05 (c) The sum of $5,954,328 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 06 Health, division of public assistance, for the purpose of addressing Supplemental Nutrition 07 Assistance Program new investment projects for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and 08 June 30, 2026. 09 * Sec. 16. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF LAW. (a) The sum of $4,000,000 is 10 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, special litigation 11 and appeals, for the purpose of ongoing litigation brought by A Better Childhood, Inc., for the 12 fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 13 (b) The sum of $3,102,700 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 14 Law, civil division, deputy attorney general's office, for the purpose of paying judgments and 15 settlements against the state for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. 16 (c) The amount necessary to pay the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 17 penalty assessed for federal fiscal year 2023, estimated to be $5,954,328, is appropriated from 18 the general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, deputy attorney general's office, for 19 that purpose for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026. 20 (d) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 21 Law, civil division, labor, business, and corporations, for costs related to labor contract 22 negotiations and arbitration support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, 23 and June 30, 2027. 24 * Sec. 17. SUPPLEMENTAL OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. After the appropriations 25 made in secs. 34(c) and (d), ch. 7, SLA 2024, and secs. 12(a) and (b) of this Act, the 26 unexpended and unobligated balance of any appropriation that is determined to be available 27 for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, not to exceed $5,000,000, is 28 appropriated to the Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, to support the 29 cost of central services agencies that provide services under AS 37.07.080(e)(2) for the fiscal 30 years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, if receipts from approved central services cost 31 allocation methods under AS 37.07.080(e)(2)(B) fall short of the amounts appropriated in ch. 01 7, SLA 2024. 02 * Sec. 18. SUPPLEMENTAL DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. Section 47(g), ch. 7, 03 SLA 2024, is amended to read: 04 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from 05 the specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 06 2025: 07 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 08 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 09 estimated to be $0 [$2,229,468], from the amount received from the United States 10 Treasury as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Build 11 America Bond credit payments due on the series 2010A general obligation bonds; 12 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 13 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, after 14 the payment made in (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $0 [$6,754,939], from the 15 general fund for that purpose; 16 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 17 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 18 estimated to be $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 19 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 20 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general 21 obligation bonds; 22 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 23 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after 24 the payment made in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $2,403,900, from the 25 general fund for that purpose; 26 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 27 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, 28 estimated to be $434,570, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 29 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 30 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general 31 obligation bonds; 01 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 02 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after 03 the payments made in (5) of this subsection, estimated to be $460,839, from the 04 general fund for that purpose; 05 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 06 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, 07 estimated to be $11,461,500 [$11,966,500], from the general fund for that purpose; 08 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 09 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, 10 estimated to be $9,358,000 [$10,381,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 11 (9) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 12 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, 13 estimated to be $9,579,375 [$10,304,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 14 (10) the sum of $511,245 from the investment earnings on the bond 15 proceeds deposited in the capital project funds for the series 2020A general obligation 16 bonds, for payment of debt service and accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska 17 general obligation bonds, series 2020A; 18 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 19 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, after 20 the payment made in (10) of this subsection, estimated to be $6,526,505, from the 21 general fund for that purpose; 22 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 23 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, 24 estimated to be $18,384,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 25 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 26 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 27 2024A, estimated to be $3,623,467, from the general fund for that purpose; 28 (14) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 29 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 30 2024B, estimated to be $1,912,228, from the general fund for that purpose; 31 (15) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding 01 State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 02 2016A, 2016B, 2020A, [AND] 2023A, 2024A, and 2024B, estimated to be $3,450, 03 from the general fund for that purpose; 04 (16) [(14)] the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing 05 payment to the United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax 06 penalties on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be 07 $50,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 08 (17) [(15)] if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are 09 temporarily insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with 10 these proceeds, the amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general 11 fund, contingent on repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general 12 obligation bond proceeds have been received by the state; and 13 (18) [(16)] if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 14 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the 15 amounts appropriated in this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the 16 obligations, from the general fund for that purpose. 17 * Sec. 19. SUPPLEMENTAL FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The sum of $29,000,000 is 18 appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 19 (b) The sum of $13,141,700 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 20 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 21 (c) The sum of $327,272 is appropriated to the election fund required by the federal 22 Help America Vote Act from the following sources: 23 (1) $54,545 from the general fund; 24 (2) $272,727 from federal receipts. 25 * Sec. 20. SUPPLEMENTAL RATIFICATION OF CERTAIN EXPENDITURES. The 26 following departmental expenditures made in fiscal years 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 27 2022, and 2024 are ratified to reverse the negative account balances in the Alaska state 28 accounting system in the amount listed for the AR number. The appropriations from which 29 those expenditures were actually paid are amended by increasing those appropriations for the 30 fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the amount listed, as follows: 31 AGENCY FISCAL YEAR AMOUNT 01 Department of Health 02 (1) AR H002 Behavioral 2017 $ 633,500.00 03 Health 04 (2) AR H004 Health Care 2017 34,500.00 05 Services 06 (3) AR H007 Public Health 2017 2,078,200.00 07 (4) AR H008 Senior and 2017 177,500.00 08 Disabilities Services 09 Department of Natural Resources 10 (5) AR NO09 Federal and Local 2013 61,701.00 11 Government Funded Forest 12 Resource and Fire Program 13 Projects 14 (6) AR NM11 Federal and Local 2015 65,181.00 15 Government Funded Forest 16 Resource and Fire Program 17 Projects 18 (7) AR NAGO Agriculture 2016 4,338.00 19 Development 20 (8) AR NUBC Unbudgeted Capital 2019 18,948.00 21 RSAs 22 (9) AR NPKO Parks and Outdoor 2022 232,201.00 23 Recreation 24 University of Alaska 25 (10) AR YUA1 Budget 2024 32,500,000.00 26 Reductions/Additions – 27 Systemwide 28 * Sec. 21. ALASKA AEROSPACE CORPORATION. Federal receipts and other corporate 29 receipts of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 30 2026, that exceed the amount appropriated in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Alaska 31 Aerospace Corporation for operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 01 * Sec. 22. ALASKA COURT SYSTEM. The amount necessary, estimated to be $0, not to 02 exceed $75,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the Judiciary, Commission on 03 Judicial Conduct, for special counsel costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 04 * Sec. 23. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) The board of directors of 05 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation anticipates that $37,785,000 of the adjusted change 06 in net assets from the second preceding fiscal year will be available for appropriation for the 07 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 08 (b) The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation shall retain the amount set out in (a) of 09 this section for the purpose of paying debt service for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in 10 the estimated amount of $3,185,000 for debt service on the bonds authorized under sec. 4, ch. 11 120, SLA 2004. 12 (c) After deductions for the items set out in (b) of this section and deductions for 13 appropriations for operating and capital purposes are made, any remaining balance of the 14 amount set out in (a) of this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to 15 the general fund. 16 (d) All unrestricted mortgage loan interest payments, mortgage loan commitment 17 fees, and other unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Housing Finance 18 Corporation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and all income earned on assets of 19 the corporation during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance 20 Corporation to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 18.55 and 21 AS 18.56. The corporation shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska housing 22 finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) 23 under procedures adopted by the board of directors. 24 (e) The sum of $800,000,000 is appropriated from the corporate receipts appropriated 25 to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska housing finance 26 revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) under 27 (d) of this section to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending 28 June 30, 2026, for housing loan programs not subsidized by the corporation. 29 (f) The sum of $30,000,000 is appropriated from the portion of the corporate receipts 30 appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska 31 housing finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund 01 (AS 18.56.710(a)) under (d) of this section that is derived from arbitrage earnings to the 02 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for housing 03 loan programs and projects subsidized by the corporation. 04 (g) The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska 05 Housing Finance Corporation, Alaska Sustainable Energy Corporation, to support green bank 06 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 07 * Sec. 24. ALASKA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AND EXPORT AUTHORITY. (a) 08 The sum of $20,000,000 has been declared available by the Alaska Industrial Development 09 and Export Authority board of directors under AS 44.88.088 for appropriation as the dividend 10 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. After deductions for appropriations for capital 11 purposes are made, any remaining balance of the amount set out in this subsection is 12 appropriated from the unrestricted balance in the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 13 Authority revolving fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 14 Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and 15 the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) to the general fund. 16 (b) All unrestricted loan interest payments, loan commitment fees, and other 17 unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 18 Authority during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and all income earned on assets of the 19 authority during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 20 Authority to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 44.88. The authority 21 shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 22 Authority revolving fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 23 Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and 24 the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) under procedures adopted by the 25 board of directors. 26 * Sec. 25. ALASKA PERMANENT FUND. (a) The amount required to be deposited under 27 art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska, estimated to be $368,200,000, during the 28 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the principal of the Alaska permanent 29 fund in satisfaction of that requirement. 30 (b) The amount necessary, when added to the appropriation made in (a) of this 31 section, to satisfy the deposit described under AS 37.13.010(a)(2), estimated to be 01 $79,500,000, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated from the general 02 fund to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 03 (c) The sum of $3,798,888,398 is appropriated from the earnings reserve account 04 (AS 37.13.145) to the general fund. 05 (d) The amount necessary for the payment of a permanent fund dividend of $1,000 to 06 each eligible individual and for administrative and associated costs, estimated to be 07 $685,300,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the dividend fund (AS 43.23.045(a)) 08 for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 09 (e) The income earned during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, on revenue from 10 the sources set out in AS 37.13.145(d), estimated to be $26,525,000, is appropriated to the 11 Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565). 12 (f) It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriation made in sec. 55(f), ch. 1, 13 SSSLA 2021, constitutes forward funding of the amount calculated under AS 37.13.145(c) to 14 offset the effect of inflation on the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 15 (g) The proportional share of investment management costs paid by investments of 16 funds managed by the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation is estimated to be $671,018,000. 17 (h) The amount appropriated from gross receipts of the Alaska permanent fund in sec. 18 1 of this Act includes an estimated amount of $2,547,600 attributed to the mental health trust 19 fund (AS 37.14.031) and an estimated amount of $2,439,600 attributed to the power cost 20 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) for the proportional share of investment 21 management costs of the mental health trust fund (AS 37.14.031) and the power cost 22 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)). 23 * Sec. 26. ALASKA TECHNICAL AND VOCATIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM 24 ACCOUNT. (a) Four percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and 25 vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 26 estimated to be $884,600, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education 27 program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Education and Early Development for 28 operating expenses of the Galena Interior Learning Academy for the fiscal year ending 29 June 30, 2026. 30 (b) Sixty-six percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 31 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 01 to be $14,596,200, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education 02 program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for 03 operating expenses of the following institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal 04 year ending June 30, 2026: 05 ESTIMATED 06 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 07 Alaska Technical Center 9 percent $1,990,400 08 Alaska Vocational Technical 17 percent 3,759,600 09 Center 10 Fairbanks Pipeline Training Center 7 percent 1,548,100 11 Ilisagvik College 6 percent 1,326,900 12 Northwestern Alaska Career 4 percent 884,600 13 and Technical Center 14 Partners for Progress in Delta, 3 percent 663,500 15 Inc. 16 Prince of Wales Community 5 percent 1,105,800 17 Learning Center 18 Sealaska Heritage Institute, Inc. 2 percent 442,300 19 Southwest Alaska Vocational 4 percent 884,600 20 and Education Center 21 Yuut Elitnaurviat - People's 9 percent 1,990,400 22 Learning Center 23 (c) Thirty percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 24 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 25 to be $6,634,600, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education program 26 account (AS 23.15.830) to the University of Alaska for operating expenses of the following 27 institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 28 ESTIMATED 29 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 30 University of Alaska 25 percent $5,528,800 31 University of Alaska Southeast 5 percent 1,105,800 01 * Sec. 27. BONUSES FOR CERTAIN EMPLOYEES OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH. 02 (a) The money appropriated in this Act includes amounts to implement the payment of 03 bonuses and other monetary terms of letters of agreement entered into between the state and 04 collective bargaining units under AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 05 2026. 06 (b) The Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, shall 07 (1) not later than 30 days after the Department of Law enters into a letter of 08 agreement described in (a) of this section, provide to the legislative finance division in 09 electronic form 10 (A) a copy of the letter of agreement; and 11 (B) a copy of the cost estimate prepared for the letter of agreement; 12 (2) submit a report to the co-chairs of the finance committee of each house of 13 the legislature and the legislative finance division not later than 14 (A) February 1, 2026, that summarizes all payments made under the 15 letters of agreement described in (a) of this section during the first half of the fiscal 16 year ending June 30, 2026; and 17 (B) September 30, 2026, that summarizes all payments made under the 18 letters of agreement described in (a) of this section during the second half of the fiscal 19 year ending June 30, 2026; and 20 (3) not later than 30 days after a letter of agreement described in (a) of this 21 section terminates, notify the legislative finance division of the termination. 22 * Sec. 28. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. (a) The amount necessary to fund the 23 uses of the state insurance catastrophe reserve account described in AS 37.05.289(a) is 24 appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for those uses for the 25 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 26 (b) The amount necessary to fund the uses of the working reserve account described 27 in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for 28 those uses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 29 (c) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $5,000,000 in the 30 working reserve account described in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from the unexpended 31 and unobligated balance of any appropriation enacted to finance the payment of employee 01 salaries and benefits that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year 02 ending June 30, 2026, to the working reserve account (AS 37.05.510(a)). 03 (d) The amount necessary to maintain, after the appropriation made in (c) of this 04 section, a minimum target claim reserve balance of one and one-half times the amount of 05 outstanding claims in the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095), estimated to be 06 $10,000,000, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 07 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 08 June 30, 2026, to the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095). It is the intent of the 09 legislature that the rate for the employer contribution to the AlaskaCare employee health plan 10 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, be set based on the full actuarial rate without relying 11 on lapsed funding. 12 (e) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $50,000,000 in the state 13 insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)), after the appropriations made in (c) 14 and (d) of this section, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 15 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 16 June 30, 2026, to the state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)). 17 (f) If the amount necessary to cover plan sponsor costs, including actuarial costs, for 18 retirement system benefit payment calculations exceeds the amount appropriated for that 19 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, after all allowable payments from retirement system fund 20 sources, that amount, not to exceed $500,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 21 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 22 (g) The amount necessary to cover actuarial costs associated with bills in the finance 23 committee of each house of the legislature, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the 24 general fund to the Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 25 June 30, 2026. 26 * Sec. 29. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 27 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance of federal money 28 apportioned to the state as national forest income that the Department of Commerce, 29 Community, and Economic Development determines would lapse into the unrestricted portion 30 of the general fund on June 30, 2026, under AS 41.15.180(j) is appropriated to home rule 31 cities, first class cities, second class cities, a municipality organized under federal law, or 01 regional educational attendance areas entitled to payment from the national forest income for 02 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to be allocated among the recipients of national forest 03 income according to their pro rata share of the total amount distributed under AS 41.15.180(c) 04 and (d) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 05 (b) If the amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments under 06 AS 41.15.180 exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 07 amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments is appropriated from federal 08 receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, and 09 Economic Development, revenue sharing, national forest receipts allocation, for the fiscal 10 year ending June 30, 2026. 11 (c) If the amount necessary to make payments in lieu of taxes for cities in the 12 unorganized borough under AS 44.33.020(a)(20) exceeds the amount appropriated for that 13 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the amount necessary to make those payments is appropriated 14 from federal receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, 15 and Economic Development, revenue sharing, payment in lieu of taxes allocation, for the 16 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 17 (d) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 42.45.085(a), estimated to 18 be $48,049,800, not to exceed the amount described in AS 42.45.085(a), is appropriated from 19 the power cost equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the Department of 20 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, power cost 21 equalization allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 22 (e) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 23 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 24 estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated to the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 25 Commission for the purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use 26 covered by the bond for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 27 (f) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from program receipts received by the 28 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, 29 under AS 21 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 30 division of insurance, for actuarial support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and 31 June 30, 2027. 01 (g) Forty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 02 year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $181,879, not to exceed $200,000, is appropriated 03 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a 04 grant under AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska Marine Safety Education Association for marine 05 safety education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 06 (h) The amount of federal receipts received for the reinsurance program under 07 AS 21.55 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the Department of 08 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, for the 09 reinsurance program under AS 21.55 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 10 2027. 11 (i) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d)(21) during the fiscal year 12 ending June 30, 2025, for the issuance of special request National Rifle Association license 13 plates, estimated to be $7,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 14 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant under 15 AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska SCTP, non profit corporation, for maintenance of scholastic clay 16 target programs and other youth shooting programs, including travel budgets to compete in 17 national collegiate competitions, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 18 (j) The amount calculated under AS 37.14.620(a), estimated to be $10,000, is 19 appropriated from the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund (AS 37.14.600) to the 20 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant 21 under AS 37.05.316 to Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska for Arctic Winter Games events 22 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 23 * Sec. 30. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Fifty 24 percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 25 2026, estimated to be $461,000, is appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 26 Development to be distributed as grants to school districts according to the average daily 27 membership for each school district, adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D), for the 28 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 29 (b) Federal funds received by the Department of Education and Early Development, 30 education support and administrative services, that exceed the amount appropriated to the 31 Department of Education and Early Development, education support and administrative 01 services, in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 02 Development, education support and administrative services, for that purpose for the fiscal 03 year ending June 30, 2026. 04 (c) The proceeds from the sale of state-owned Mt. Edgecumbe High School land in 05 Sitka by the Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 06 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and Early 07 Development, Mt. Edgecumbe High School, for maintenance and operations for the fiscal 08 year ending June 30, 2026. 09 (d) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(a)(3) during the fiscal year 10 ending June 30, 2025, for the issuance of celebrating the arts license plates, less the cost of 11 issuing the license plates, estimated to be $80,000, is appropriated from the general fund to 12 the Department of Education and Early Development, Alaska State Council on the Arts, for 13 administration of the celebrating the arts license plate program for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2026. 15 (e) The amount necessary, after the appropriation made in sec. 43(h) of this Act, to 16 fund the total amount for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of state aid calculated under 17 the public school funding formula under AS 14.17.410(b) using a base student allocation 18 (AS 14.17.470) amount of $6,640, estimated to be $172,176,800, is appropriated from the 19 general fund to the Department of Education and Early Development to be distributed as 20 grants to school districts according to the average daily membership for each district adjusted 21 under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 22 (f) The sum of $6,781,200 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 23 Education and Early Development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to be distributed 24 as grants to school districts that are proportional to the amount each school district receives 25 from the state to operate the student transportation system under AS 14.09.010. 26 (g) The sum of $554,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 27 Education and Early Development, education support and administrative services, student and 28 school achievement, for teacher incentive payments and reimbursements for national board 29 certification, as authorized by AS 14.20.225, as follows: 30 (1) the amount necessary to make all reimbursement payments authorized by 31 AS 14.20.225(b); 01 (2) the remaining balance to make national board certification incentive 02 payments authorized by AS 14.20.225(a), to be distributed on a first-come, first-served basis. 03 * Sec. 31. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND COMMUNITY SERVICES. The amount of 04 statutory designated program receipts received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 05 from the provision of pharmaceuticals to residents of the Alaska Pioneers' Homes, not to 06 exceed $4,000,000, are appropriated to the Department of Family and Community Services, 07 Alaska Pioneers' Homes, for operation of the pharmacy program for the fiscal year ending 08 June 30, 2026. 09 * Sec. 32. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. The amount of statutory designated 10 program receipts received for fisheries disasters during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 11 estimated to be $0, are appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for fisheries disaster 12 relief for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 13 * Sec. 33. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. Federal receipts received during the fiscal year 14 ending June 30, 2026, for Medicaid services are appropriated to the Department of Health, 15 Medicaid services, for Medicaid services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 16 * Sec. 34. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. (a) If the 17 amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty 18 fund (AS 23.30.082) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, 19 the additional amount necessary to pay those benefit payments is appropriated for that 20 purpose from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty fund (AS 23.30.082) to the 21 Department of Labor and Workforce Development, workers' compensation benefits guaranty 22 fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 23 (b) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the second injury fund 24 (AS 23.30.040(a)) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 25 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 26 from the second injury fund (AS 23.30.040(a)) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 27 Development, second injury fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 28 (c) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the fishermen's fund 29 (AS 23.35.060) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 30 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 31 from the fishermen's fund (AS 23.35.060) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 01 Development, fishermen's fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 02 (d) If the amount of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational Technical Center 03 under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, AS 43.65.018, 04 AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, exceeds the 05 amount appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska 06 Vocational Technical Center, in sec. 1 of this Act, the additional contributions are 07 appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska Vocational 08 Technical Center, Alaska Vocational Technical Center allocation, for the purpose of operating 09 the center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 10 * Sec. 35. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. (a) Five percent 11 of the average ending market value in the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 12 (AS 37.14.700) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, 13 estimated to be $8,859, is appropriated from the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 14 (AS 37.14.700) to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the purposes specified 15 in AS 37.14.730(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 16 (b) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) during the fiscal year 17 ending June 30, 2026, for the issuance of special request license plates commemorating 18 Alaska veterans, less the cost of issuing the license plates, estimated to be $6,700, is 19 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the 20 maintenance, repair, replacement, enhancement, development, and construction of veterans' 21 memorials for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 22 * Sec. 36. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.(a) The interest earned during 23 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, on the reclamation bond posted by Cook Inlet Energy for 24 operation of an oil production platform in Cook Inlet under lease with the Department of 25 Natural Resources, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from interest held in the general 26 fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the purpose of the bond for the fiscal year 27 ending June 30, 2026. 28 (b) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 29 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 30 reclamation trust fund operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the Department of Natural 31 Resources for those purposes for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 01 (c) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 02 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 03 estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for the 04 purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use covered by the bond 05 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 06 (d) Sixty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 07 year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $272,819, not to exceed $300,000, is appropriated 08 to the Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, for the 09 boating safety program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 10 * Sec. 37. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The proportional share of investment 11 management costs paid by investments of funds managed by the Alaska Retirement 12 Management Board is estimated to be $167,000,000. 13 * Sec. 38. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. (a) The 14 proceeds received from the sale of Alaska marine highway system assets during the fiscal 15 year ending June 30, 2026, are appropriated to the Alaska marine highway system vessel 16 replacement fund (AS 37.05.550). 17 (b) It is the intent of the legislature that, for the appropriations made in sec. 5, ch. 7, 18 SLA 2024, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities prioritize spending federal 19 funds and unrestricted general funds first, preserving the balance of the Alaska marine 20 highway system fund (AS 19.65.060(a)) to the extent possible. 21 (c) Section 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 39, lines 32 - 33, is amended to read: 22 The amounts allocated for highways and aviation shall lapse into the general 23 fund on June 30, 2026 [AUGUST 31, 2025]. 24 (d) If the amount of federal receipts that are received by the Department of 25 Transportation and Public Facilities for the period beginning January 1, 2026, and ending 26 December 31, 2026, fall short of the amount appropriated in sec. 5 of this Act, the amount of 27 the shortfall, not to exceed $5,000,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 28 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, Alaska marine highway system, for 29 operation of marine highway vessels for the period beginning January 1, 2026, and ending 30 December 31, 2026. 31 * Sec. 39. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The sum of $2,870,300 is appropriated from 01 the general fund to the Office of the Governor, division of elections, for costs associated with 02 conducting the statewide primary and general elections for the fiscal years ending June 30, 03 2026, and June 30, 2027. 04 (b) After the appropriations made in secs. 28(c) - (e) of this Act, the unexpended and 05 unobligated balance of any appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end 06 of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, not to exceed $2,000,000, is appropriated to the 07 Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, to support the cost of central 08 services agencies that provide services under AS 37.07.080(e)(2) for the fiscal years ending 09 June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, if receipts from approved central services cost allocation 10 methods under AS 37.07.080(e)(2)(B) fall short of the amounts appropriated in this Act. 11 * Sec. 40. BANKCARD SERVICE FEES. (a) The amount necessary to compensate the 12 collector or trustee of fees, licenses, taxes, or other money belonging to the state during the 13 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2026, to the agency authorized by law to generate the revenue, from the funds and 15 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. In this subsection, 16 "collector or trustee" includes vendors retained by the state on a contingency fee basis. 17 (b) The amount necessary to compensate the provider of bankcard or credit card 18 services to the state during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated for that 19 purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to each agency of the executive, legislative, 20 and judicial branches that accepts payment by bankcard or credit card for licenses, permits, 21 goods, and services provided by that agency on behalf of the state, from the funds and 22 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. 23 * Sec. 41. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The amount required to be paid by the 24 state for the principal of and interest on all issued and outstanding state-guaranteed bonds, 25 estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska Housing Finance 26 Corporation for payment of the principal of and interest on those bonds for the fiscal year 27 ending June 30, 2026. 28 (b) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 29 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 30 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,080,000, is appropriated from interest 31 earnings of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) to the Alaska clean water fund 01 revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 02 (c) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 03 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 04 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,030,500, is appropriated from interest 05 earnings of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) to the Alaska drinking water 06 fund revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 07 (d) The sum of $2,792,217 is appropriated from the general fund to the following 08 agencies for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for payment of debt service on outstanding 09 debt authorized by AS 14.40.257, AS 29.60.700, and AS 42.45.065, respectively, for the 10 following projects: 11 AGENCY AND PROJECT APPROPRIATION AMOUNT 12 (1) University of Alaska $1,218,193 13 Anchorage Community and Technical 14 College Center 15 Juneau Readiness Center/UAS Joint Facility 16 (2) Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 17 (A) Aleutians East Borough/False Pass 214,855 18 small boat harbor 19 (B) City of Valdez harbor renovations 189,625 20 (C) Aleutians East Borough/Akutan 108,178 21 small boat harbor 22 (D) Fairbanks North Star Borough 341,500 23 Eielson AFB Schools, major 24 maintenance and upgrades 25 (E) City of Unalaska Little South America 368,686 26 (LSA) Harbor 27 (3) Alaska Energy Authority 351,180 28 Copper Valley Electric Association 29 cogeneration projects 30 (e) The amount necessary for payment of lease payments and trustee fees relating to 31 certificates of participation issued for real property for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 01 estimated to be $2,893,500, is appropriated from the general fund to the state bond committee 02 for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 03 (f) The sum of $3,303,500 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 04 Administration for the purpose of paying the obligation of the Linny Pacillo Parking Garage 05 in Anchorage to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 06 2026. 07 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 08 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 09 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 10 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, estimated to be 11 $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the 12 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond 13 interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general obligation bonds; 14 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 15 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after the payment made in 16 (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $144,127, from the general fund for that purpose; 17 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 18 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, estimated to be $434,570, 19 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the American 20 Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond interest 21 subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general obligation bonds; 22 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 23 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after the payments made 24 in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $26,268, from the general fund for that purpose; 25 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 26 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, estimated to be 27 $9,793,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 28 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 29 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, estimated to be 30 $6,247,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 31 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 01 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, estimated to be 02 $6,226,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 03 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 04 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be 05 $6,971,625, from the general fund for that purpose; 06 (9) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for arbitrage 07 rebate on State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be $4,025,000, 08 from investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in the capital project funds for the 09 series 2020A general obligation bonds for that purpose; 10 (10) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 11 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, estimated to be 12 $18,398,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 13 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 14 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, estimated to be 15 $5,504,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 16 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 17 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, estimated to be 18 $4,147,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 19 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 20 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, estimated to be 21 $3,956,229, from the general fund for that purpose; 22 (14) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding State of 23 Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 2016A, 2016B, 2020A, 24 2023A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, estimated to be $7,500, from the general fund for that 25 purpose; 26 (15) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to the 27 United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on outstanding State 28 of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from the general fund for that 29 purpose; 30 (16) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are temporarily 31 insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with these proceeds, the 01 amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general fund, contingent on 02 repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general obligation bond proceeds 03 have been received by the state; and 04 (17) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest 05 on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts appropriated in 06 this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, from the general fund 07 for that purpose. 08 (h) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 09 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 10 (1) the amount necessary for debt service on outstanding international airports 11 revenue bonds, estimated to be $1,000,000, from the collection of passenger facility charges 12 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration at the Alaska international airports system; 13 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and trustee fees on 14 outstanding international airports revenue bonds, after the payment made in (1) of this 15 subsection, estimated to be $22,935,675, from the International Airports Revenue Fund 16 (AS 37.15.430(a)) for that purpose; and 17 (3) the amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption 18 premiums, and trustee fees, if any, associated with the early redemption of international 19 airports revenue bonds authorized under AS 37.15.410 - 37.15.550, estimated to be 20 $10,000,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)). 21 (i) If federal receipts are temporarily insufficient to cover international airports 22 system project expenditures approved for funding with those receipts, the amount necessary to 23 prevent that cash deficiency, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the 24 International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 25 2026, contingent on repayment to the general fund, as soon as additional federal receipts have 26 been received by the state for that purpose. 27 (j) The amount of federal receipts deposited in the International Airports Revenue 28 Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) necessary to reimburse the general fund for international airports 29 system project expenditures, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the International 30 Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) to the general fund. 31 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose Creek 01 Correctional Center, estimated to be $16,170,163, is appropriated from the general fund to the 02 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 03 (l) The sum of $34,882,150 is appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 04 Development for state aid for costs of school construction under AS 14.11.100 for the fiscal 05 year ending June 30, 2026, from the following sources: 06 (1) $11,000,000 from the School Fund (AS 43.50.140); 07 (2) $23,882,150 from the general fund. 08 * Sec. 42. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. (a) Federal receipts, 09 designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program 10 receipts under AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under 11 AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the 12 Alaska marine highway system fund under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the University of 13 Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment working capital fund 14 under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing operations under 15 AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and that 16 exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on compliance with 17 the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under this subsection 18 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, do not include the balance of a state fund on 19 June 30, 2025. 20 (b) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 21 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, exceed the amounts appropriated by 22 this Act, the appropriations from state funds for the affected program shall be reduced by the 23 excess if the reductions are consistent with applicable federal statutes. 24 (c) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 25 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, fall short of the amounts 26 appropriated by this Act, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall 27 in receipts. 28 (d) The amount of designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) 29 appropriated in this Act includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, 30 of designated program receipts collected under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) for that purpose. 31 (e) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an appropriation item for the fiscal year 01 ending June 30, 2026, may not be increased under AS 37.07.080(h) based on the Alaska 02 Gasline Development Corporation's receipt of additional 03 (1) federal receipts; or 04 (2) statutory designated program receipts. 05 * Sec. 43. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The portions of the fees listed in this subsection 06 that are collected during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $16,000, are 07 appropriated to the Alaska children's trust grant account (AS 37.14.205(a)): 08 (1) fees collected under AS 18.50.225, less the cost of supplies, for the 09 issuance of heirloom birth certificates; 10 (2) fees collected under AS 18.50.272, less the cost of supplies, for the 11 issuance of heirloom marriage certificates; 12 (3) fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) for the issuance of special request 13 Alaska children's trust license plates, less the cost of issuing the license plates. 14 (b) The amount received from fees assessed under AS 05.25.096(a)(5) and (6), civil 15 penalties collected under AS 30.30.015, the sale of vessels under AS 30.30, and donations and 16 other receipts deposited under AS 30.30.096 as program receipts during the fiscal year ending 17 June 30, 2026, less the amount of those program receipts appropriated to the Department of 18 Administration, division of motor vehicles, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 19 to be $44,500, is appropriated to the derelict vessel prevention program fund (AS 30.30.096). 20 (c) The amount of federal receipts received for disaster relief during the fiscal year 21 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $9,000,000, is appropriated to the disaster relief fund 22 (AS 26.23.300(a)). 23 (d) The sum of $23,344,800 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 24 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 25 (e) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 26 to be $230,500, is appropriated to the dividend raffle fund (AS 43.23.230(a)). 27 (f) The amount of municipal bond bank receipts determined under AS 44.85.270(h) to 28 be available for transfer by the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority for the fiscal year 29 ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $0, is appropriated to the Alaska municipal bond bank 30 authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 31 (g) If the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority must draw on the Alaska municipal 01 bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)) because of a default by a borrower, an 02 amount equal to the amount drawn from the reserve is appropriated from the general fund to 03 the Alaska municipal bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 04 (h) The amount necessary, estimated to be $1,111,921,008, when added to the balance 05 of the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) on June 30, 2025, to fund the total amount for the 06 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of state aid calculated under the public school funding 07 formula under AS 14.17.410(b) is appropriated to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) 08 from the following sources: 09 (1) $35,070,007 from the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)); 10 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 11 subsection, estimated to be $1,076,851,001, from the general fund. 12 (i) The amount necessary to fund transportation of students under AS 14.09.010 for 13 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $67,812,273, is appropriated from the 14 general fund to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300). 15 (j) The sum of $22,884,400 is appropriated from the general fund to the regional 16 educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund 17 (AS 14.11.030(a)). 18 (k) The amount necessary to pay medical insurance premiums for eligible surviving 19 dependents under AS 39.60.040 and the costs of the Department of Public Safety associated 20 with administering the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for the 21 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated from the general 22 fund to the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for that purpose. 23 (l) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the Alaska 24 clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, less the 25 amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, estimated to be 26 $20,258,600, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska clean water fund 27 (AS 46.03.032(a)). 28 (m) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 29 capitalization of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending 30 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $3,797,200, is appropriated to the Alaska clean water fund 31 (AS 46.03.032(a)) from the following sources: 01 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska clean water fund 02 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $1,075,000; 03 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 04 subsection, not to exceed $2,722,200, from the general fund. 05 (n) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the 06 Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 07 less the amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, 08 estimated to be $32,666,100, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska drinking 09 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)). 10 (o) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 11 capitalization of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year 12 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $5,622,500, is appropriated to the Alaska drinking 13 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) from the following sources: 14 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska drinking water fund 15 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $1,025,500; 16 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 17 subsection, not to exceed $4,597,000, from the general fund. 18 (p) The amount received under AS 18.67.162 as program receipts, estimated to be 19 $85,000, including donations and recoveries of or reimbursement for awards made from the 20 crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162), during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 21 is appropriated to the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 22 (q) The sum of $1,682,500 is appropriated from that portion of the dividend fund 23 (AS 43.23.045(a)) that would have been paid to individuals who are not eligible to receive a 24 permanent fund dividend because of a conviction or incarceration under AS 43.23.005(d) to 25 the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162) for the purposes of the crime victim 26 compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 27 (r) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the election fund required by 28 the federal Help America Vote Act, estimated to be $200,000, is appropriated to the election 29 fund for use in accordance with 52 U.S.C. 21004(b)(2). 30 (s) The vaccine assessment program receipts collected under AS 18.09.220 during the 31 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $25,000,000, are appropriated to the vaccine 01 assessment fund (AS 18.09.230). 02 (t) The sum of $13,333,300 is appropriated from the power cost equalization 03 endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the community assistance fund (AS 29.60.850). 04 (u) Federal receipts received for fire suppression during the fiscal year ending 05 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $20,500,000, are appropriated to the fire suppression fund 06 (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 07 (v) The sum of $77,338,400 is appropriated to the fire suppression fund 08 (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities from the following sources: 09 (1) $3,000,000 from statutory designated program receipts; and 10 (2) $74,338,400 from the general fund. 11 * Sec. 44. FUND TRANSFERS. (a) The federal funds received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 12 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 not appropriated for grants under AS 37.05.530(d) are 13 appropriated as follows: 14 (1) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 15 of the State of Alaska) and the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), according to 16 AS 37.05.530(g)(1) and (2); and 17 (2) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 18 of the State of Alaska), the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), and the power cost 19 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)), according to AS 37.05.530(g)(3). 20 (b) The loan origination fees collected by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 21 Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, are appropriated to the origination fee 22 account (AS 14.43.120(u)) within the education loan fund (AS 14.42.210(a)) of the Alaska 23 Student Loan Corporation for the purposes specified in AS 14.43.120(u). 24 (c) An amount equal to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court 25 System during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, estimated to be $312,600, is appropriated 26 from the general fund to the civil legal services fund (AS 37.05.590) for the purpose of 27 making appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low- 28 income individuals. 29 (d) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 30 prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous substance release 31 prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 01 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 02 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 03 $1,047,100, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 04 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 05 be $6,000,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 06 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 07 be $6,400,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 08 (e) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 09 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 10 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 11 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 12 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2025, estimated to be $700,000, 13 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 14 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 15 be $1,500,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 16 (f) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 17 $2,000,000, of the Alaska clean water administrative income account (AS 46.03.034(a)(2)) in 18 the Alaska clean water administrative fund (AS 46.03.034) is appropriated to the Alaska clean 19 water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.034(a)(1)) in the Alaska clean water 20 administrative fund (AS 46.03.034). 21 (g) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 22 $1,000,000, of the Alaska drinking water administrative income account (AS 46.03.038(a)(2)) 23 in the Alaska drinking water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038) is appropriated to the Alaska 24 drinking water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.038(a)(1)) in the Alaska drinking 25 water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038). 26 (h) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the special aviation fuel tax 27 account (AS 43.40.010(e)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the 28 special aviation fuel tax account (AS 43.40.010(e)). 29 (i) An amount equal to the revenue collected from the following sources during the 30 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,273,000, is appropriated to the fish and 31 game fund (AS 16.05.100): 01 (1) range fees collected at shooting ranges operated by the Department of Fish 02 and Game (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), estimated to be $480,000; 03 (2) receipts from the sale of waterfowl conservation stamp limited edition 04 prints (AS 16.05.826(a)), estimated to be $3,000; 05 (3) fees collected for sanctuary access permits (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), 06 estimated to be $100,000; and 07 (4) fees collected at hunter, boating, and angling access sites managed by the 08 Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, under a 09 cooperative agreement authorized under AS 16.05.050(a)(6), estimated to be $690,000. 10 (j) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 11 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 12 reclamation trust fund income account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the mine reclamation trust fund 13 operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)). 14 (k) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 15 to be $230,500, is appropriated to the education endowment fund (AS 43.23.220). 16 (l) The unexpended and unobligated balance of the large passenger vessel gaming and 17 gambling tax account (AS 43.35.220) on June 30, 2026, estimated to be $27,934,000, is 18 appropriated to the general fund. 19 (m) The sum of $6,315,507 is appropriated from the power cost equalization 20 endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the renewable energy grant fund (AS 42.45.045). 21 (n) The amount received by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education as 22 repayment for WWAMI medical education program loans, estimated to be $575,000, is 23 appropriated to the Alaska higher education investment fund (AS 37.14.750). 24 * Sec. 45. RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUNDING. (a) The sum of $79,807,000 is 25 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Administration for deposit in the 26 defined benefit plan account in the public employees' retirement system as an additional state 27 contribution under AS 39.35.280 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 28 (b) The sum of $138,982,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 29 of Administration for deposit in the defined benefit plan account in the teachers' retirement 30 system as an additional state contribution under AS 14.25.085 for the fiscal year ending 31 June 30, 2026. 01 (c) The sum of $1,175,573 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 02 Administration to pay benefit payments to eligible members and survivors of eligible 03 members earned under the elected public officers' retirement system for the fiscal year ending 04 June 30, 2026. 05 * Sec. 46. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The operating budget 06 appropriations made in secs. 1 and 5 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit 07 adjustments for public officials, officers, and employees of the executive branch, Alaska 08 Court System employees, employees of the legislature, and legislators and to implement the 09 monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following ongoing collective 10 bargaining agreements: 11 (1) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 12 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Transportation 13 and Public Facilities; 14 (2) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 15 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Public Safety; 16 (3) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 17 (4) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 18 (5) Alaska Correctional Officers Association, representing the correctional 19 officers unit; 20 (6) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 21 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 22 (7) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 23 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 24 Center; 25 (8) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 26 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 27 (9) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 28 (10) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed 29 engineers employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 30 (11) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 31 (12) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 01 unlicensed marine unit. 02 (b) The operating budget appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of 03 this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 04 2026, for university employees who are not members of a collective bargaining unit and to 05 implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following 06 collective bargaining agreements: 07 (1) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324; 08 (2) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 09 (3) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 10 (4) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 11 American Federation of Teachers; 12 (5) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 13 Professors, American Federation of Teachers. 14 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 15 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 16 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 17 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 18 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 19 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 20 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 21 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 22 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 23 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 24 accordingly. 25 * Sec. 47. SHARED TAXES AND FEES. (a) An amount equal to the salmon enhancement 26 tax collected under AS 43.76.001 - 43.76.028 in calendar year 2024, estimated to be 27 $4,500,000, and deposited in the general fund under AS 43.76.025(c), is appropriated from 28 the general fund to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 29 for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to qualified regional associations 30 operating within a region designated under AS 16.10.375. 31 (b) An amount equal to the seafood development tax collected under AS 43.76.350 - 01 43.76.399 in calendar year 2024, estimated to be $2,300,000, and deposited in the general 02 fund under AS 43.76.380(d), is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 03 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment in the fiscal year ending 04 June 30, 2026, to qualified regional seafood development associations for the following 05 purposes: 06 (1) promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the 07 region and processed for sale; 08 (2) promotion of improvements to the commercial fishing industry and 09 infrastructure in the seafood development region; 10 (3) establishment of education, research, advertising, or sales promotion 11 programs for seafood products harvested in the region; 12 (4) preparation of market research and product development plans for the 13 promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the region and processed 14 for sale; 15 (5) cooperation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute and other public 16 or private boards, organizations, or agencies engaged in work or activities similar to the work 17 of the organization, including entering into contracts for joint programs of consumer 18 education, sales promotion, quality control, advertising, and research in the production, 19 processing, or distribution of seafood harvested in the region; 20 (6) cooperation with commercial fishermen, fishermen's organizations, 21 seafood processors, the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation, the Fishery Industrial 22 Technology Center, state and federal agencies, and other relevant persons and entities to 23 investigate market reception to new seafood product forms and to develop commodity 24 standards and future markets for seafood products. 25 (c) An amount equal to the dive fishery management assessment collected under 26 AS 43.76.150 - 43.76.210 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be 27 $455,000 and deposited in the general fund, is appropriated from the general fund to the 28 Department of Fish and Game for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to the 29 qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area where the 30 assessment was collected. 31 (d) The amount necessary to refund to local governments and other entities their share 01 of taxes and fees collected in the listed fiscal years under the following programs is 02 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Revenue for payment to local 03 governments and other entities in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 04 FISCAL YEAR ESTIMATED 05 REVENUE SOURCE COLLECTED AMOUNT 06 Fisheries business tax (AS 43.75) 2025 $17,908,000 07 Fishery resource landing tax (AS 43.77) 2025 5,994,000 08 Electric and telephone cooperative tax 2026 4,436,000 09 (AS 10.25.570) 10 Liquor license fee (AS 04.11) 2026 790,000 11 Cost recovery fisheries (AS 16.10.455) 2026 0 12 (e) The amount necessary to refund to local governments the full amount of an 13 aviation fuel tax or surcharge collected under AS 43.40 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 14 2026, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from the proceeds of the aviation fuel tax or 15 surcharge levied under AS 43.40 to the Department of Revenue for that purpose. 16 (f) The amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax 17 collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025, according to AS 43.52.230(b), estimated 18 to be $28,710,000, is appropriated from the commercial vessel passenger tax account 19 (AS 43.52.230(a)) to the Department of Revenue for payment to the ports of call for the fiscal 20 year ending June 30, 2026. 21 (g) If the amount in the commercial vessel passenger tax account (AS 43.52.230(a)) 22 that is derived from the tax collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025 is less than 23 the amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax collected under 24 AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025, according to AS 43.52.230(b), the appropriation made in 25 (f) of this section shall be reduced in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 26 * Sec. 48. RATIFICATION OF SMALL AMOUNTS IN STATE ACCOUNTING. The 27 appropriation to each department under this Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is 28 reduced to reverse negative account balances in amounts of $1,000 or less for the department 29 in the state accounting system for each prior fiscal year in which a negative account balance 30 of $1,000 or less exists. 31 * Sec. 49. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS. (a) If the unrestricted general fund revenue, 01 including the appropriation made in sec. 25(c) of this Act, collected in the fiscal year ending 02 June 30, 2026, exceeds $6,300,000,000, the amount remaining, after all appropriations have 03 been made that take effect in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the difference between 04 $6,300,000,000 and the actual unrestricted general fund revenue collected in the fiscal year 05 ending June 30, 2026, not to exceed $700,000,000, is appropriated to the budget reserve fund 06 (AS 37.05.540(a)). 07 (b) If, after the appropriation made in sec. 55, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the unrestricted state 08 revenue available for appropriation in fiscal year 2025 is insufficient to cover the general fund 09 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that were passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska 10 State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law and that are passed by 11 the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, 12 not including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the amount necessary to 13 balance revenue and general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that were 14 passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and 15 enacted into law and that are passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First 16 Regular Session and enacted into law, not including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, 17 SLA 2024, is appropriated to the general fund from the following sources: 18 (1) the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund appropriations 19 that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that were passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska State 20 Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law and that are passed by the 21 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, not 22 including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, not to exceed $100,000,000, 23 from the unexpended and unobligated balance of the reserves of the Alaska Industrial 24 Development and Export Authority, including fund balances held by the Alaska Industrial 25 Development and Export Authority; 26 (2) the remaining amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund 27 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that were passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska 28 State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law and that are passed by 29 the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, 30 not including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, from the Alaska higher 31 education investment fund (AS 37.14.750). 01 * Sec. 50. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If, after the appropriation 02 made in sec. 55, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in 03 fiscal year 2025 is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations that take effect in 04 fiscal year 2025 that were passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska State Legislature in the Second 05 Regular Session and enacted into law and that are passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State 06 Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, not including the appropriations 07 made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund 08 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that were passed by the Thirty-Third Alaska 09 State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law and that are passed by 10 the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law, 11 not including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, is appropriated to the 12 general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 13 Alaska). 14 (b) The appropriation made from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, 15 Constitution of the State of Alaska) in (a) of this section is made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 16 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 17 * Sec. 51. Section 69(b), ch. 11, SLA 2022, sec. 64(a), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, and sec. 36(j), 18 ch. 7, SLA 2024, are repealed. 19 * Sec. 52. Section 32(f), ch. 7, SLA 2024, sec. 34(e), ch. 7, SLA 2024, and sec. 44(b), ch. 7, 20 SLA 2024, are repealed. 21 * Sec. 53. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations made in secs. 12(a) and (b), 22 19, 25(a), (b), (d), and (e), 28(c) - (e), 38(a), 41(b), (c), and (i), 43, 44(a) - (k), (m), and (n), 23 45(a) and (b), and 49(a) of this Act are for the capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 24 * Sec. 54. RETROACTIVITY. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act that 25 appropriate either the unexpended and unobligated balance of specific fiscal year 2025 26 program receipts or the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of a specified 27 account are retroactive to June 30, 2025, solely for the purpose of carrying forward a prior 28 fiscal year balance. 29 (b) Sections 8 - 11, 12(c), 13(a), 15, 16, 18 - 20, and 51 of this Act are retroactive to 30 March 31, 2025. 31 (c) Sections 12(a) and (b), 13(b), 14, 17, 44(d) and (e), 49(b), 50, 52, and 55(e) of this 01 Act are retroactive to June 30, 2025. 02 (d) Sections 1 - 4, 21 - 37, 38(a) - (c), 39 - 43, 44(a) - (c) and (f) - (n), 45 - 48, 49(a), 03 53, and 55(a) - (d) of this Act are retroactive to July 1, 2025. 04 * Sec. 55. CONTINGENCIES. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for the 05 payment of a bonus to an employee in the executive branch of the state government who is a 06 member of a collective bargaining unit established under the authority of AS 23.40.070 - 07 23.40.260 (Public Employment Relations Act) but for which the state and applicable 08 bargaining unit of the employee have not yet entered into a letter of agreement under 09 AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 are contingent on the following: 10 (1) the state and the applicable bargaining unit of the employee entering into a 11 letter of agreement under AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 for the bonus; and 12 (2) the Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, satisfying 13 the requirements of sec. 27(b)(1) of this Act. 14 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 16(c) of this Act is contingent on the Department 15 of Health receiving notice from the United States Department of Agriculture Food and 16 Nutrition Service that a liability amount is again established for federal fiscal year 2024, 17 requiring the state to make a payment to satisfy the state's liability for the Supplemental 18 Nutrition Assistance Program penalty assessed for federal fiscal year 2023. 19 (c) The appropriation made in sec. 30(e) of this Act is contingent on the failure of a 20 bill increasing the base student allocation to be passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State 21 Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law. 22 (d) The appropriation made in sec. 30(f) of this Act is contingent on the failure of a 23 version of House Bill 76 or a similar bill increasing student transportation funding to be 24 passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted 25 into law. 26 (e) The appropriations made in sec. 49(b) of this Act are contingent on the failure of 27 the appropriation made in sec. 50(a) of this Act to be enacted into law. 28 * Sec. 56. Sections 8 - 11, 12(c), 13(a), 15, 16, 18 - 20, 51, and 54 of this Act take effect 29 immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 30 * Sec. 57. Sections 12(a) and (b), 13(b), 14, 17, 44(d) and (e), 49(b), 50, 52, and 55(e) of 31 this Act take effect June 30, 2025. 01 * Sec. 58. Sections 5 - 7 and 38(d) of this Act take effect January 1, 2026. 02 * Sec. 59. Except as provided in secs. 56 - 58 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.